We’ve had our first phone call in over twenty years, a teary catch up with our news then she said it, do you remember the card board box..the years fell away and we dissolved into giggles in the only way young girls can, it’s only funny to us , I suppose you had to be there.
run further
I will continue to try my best to inspire, paint crazy shit, paint my kids, and maybe even do something extra special like this for you...
The Deseret News, like other news organizations in Utah, did not reveal the list. “I would be pretty shocked, even in this state, if somebody did that,” said Michael Anastasi, a managing editor at The Salt Lake Tribune.
I have always been prone to motion sickness. My mother would say multiple times during a road trip, “Focus on the center yellow line and you’ll be fine.”
Tori Meyer and Jay Kijai have been dating/lovers for 2 and a half years and are possibly about to elope to Italy. They met in an art class in 2009 when Tori bought him a dinosaur shaped cookie for his birthday. They have never experienced any tensions because of their interracial relationship.
Jennyh_97236@yahoo.com
an adult
But I'd like to believe that our demons, no matter how complex, can be tamed by the desire to be good. And since I'd like to be good, then perhaps that desire is my greatest virtue. Which can be greater than all my flaws combined.
Another important disclaimer I need to make, is that if any of the above-mentioned characters ever succeed in shutting down this blog, the backup-blog will spring into action faster than you can say “Zuma” – so try if you want to!
OHIM then proceeded to examine Dave Soho's opposition under the UK law of passing off. After accepting that the law in this area is ‘complex’, OHIM summarized the three elements which need to be established. These are (a) that the opponents’ goods or services have acquired a goodwill or reputation in the market and are known by some distinguishing feature, (b) there is a misrepresentation by the applicant, and (c) the misrepresentation causes damage to the opponent (or is likely to).
We hope to see lots of our regular Mag shoppers, plus
Get in the car HERSELF
2) Boobs.
Once we had the header all figured out, she did an awesome job adjusting the rest of her theme to the header's color scheme, and I'm really loving this light look. The rating system was cool too, you need to head on over to her book blog and read a review to see it in action sometime during the next few days.
"I don't know if UNISON has learnt from previous regional pensions summits but the whole day was stage managed to ensure that the views of lay members were heard as little as possible.
unfortunate enough to put them on, you're just going to dance and
Fortunately, we now have an ace in the hole: my wife has been promoted to manager, and so she has to be at the store during the holidays. Yahtzee! No driving to Atlanta for us! Ka-loo, Ka-lay!
The Last Unicorn – Beagle
Come on, it's been a while since we had one of these stories...
The short answer: Sort of.
and shorter, as we try to speed to the future endpoint?
Mylene Farmer Désenchantée CAN
Moving apart in tachyon speeds we land in a new world
I have been having feeding tube issues* lately. I have also not been as diligent as I should be about keeping the feed on all the time and getting all the enzyme administrations done (6 times a day, about 3 hours apart). The early morning ones and late night ones are hard because he's asleep and to get him to take the enzymes by mouth requires waking him up. Usually he chokes, then he's awake. It's not a fun thing. Now there is a thing you can do to dissolve the enzyme beads in bisodium carbonate then actually add it to the feed for the late night or early morning feed. It is not the best scenario- it's second best, but it's better than not at all. Only one administration per day will be done this way. The rest will be done by mouth as usual. We also changed the formula again, in case it might make a difference. The formula itself is the same, just a different brand.
Last year I was a little depressed to find out my office does absolutely no decorating for the holiday season, and while I can certainly appreciate not being forced to buy a present for some silly holiday party, I was a bit sad to have no decorations to liven up our office. So, my very BIG goal is to make 4 of these little felted Christmas trees before the middle of December to give to each of my co-workers. That way each one of the offices will have a little holiday cheer on the desk.
The leaked MIUI 4 beta for the One X is fully operational, maintaining features such as the stock HTC camera, gallery and music (including Beats Audio). If you want to install either, then check out the tutorials below.
And one should not take to the streets packing that kind of ‘tude.
2) We’ll have a new champion as the ‘Caps took down the B’s in game 7 that went to OT
You can fall for pretty strangers
Marley pretty much knows but doesn't have the label to put on her randomly crying, moody, fun, hysterically funny, dancing (all in one minute) mom.
This was for my wonderful friend Kate (owner of i {heart} papers). Paper is from the For the Record collection kit, stamps are Technique Tuesday’s Stamping in Circles, and I used one of the Spellbinders fancy tags set for the scrolled medallion piece. I loved how it coordinated so well with the paper and stamp design! I colored in the white space on the circle thingie with a Copic marker to make it match the paper better. What I forgot is that Kate is not fond of red. Sorry!
Changeling by Philippa Gregory (ARC)
In section 1 of Republic Act No. 342, approved on July 26, 1948, it was categorically declared by the Congress that “since liberation conditions have gradually returned to normal, but not so with regard to those who have suffered the ravages of war and who have not received any relief for the loss and destruction resulting therefrom,” and that “the emergency created by the last war as regards these was sufferers being still existent, it is the declared policy of the state that as to them the debt moratorium should be continued in force in a modified form.” The President, in turn, in his speech delivered on July 4, 1949, plainly proclaimed that “what emergencies it (the Republic) faces today are incidental passing pains artificially created by seasonal partisanship, very common among democracies but will disappear with the rains that follow the thunderclaps not later than November 8 of this year.”
The information below is about the leadership of the Mayor of the City of Atlanta and the Metro Atlanta Chamber of Commerce:
Had Google permitted hundreds of its censorship victims view the potentially vital information posted on this and other blogs, warning consumers, air travelers and holidaymakers against potentially deadly products, activities and places, at least some of the following people may have still been alive today.
As and when they become a more regular feature of my interaction with the rest of the world, I’ll return to the optician and see about getting a proper pair.
I made this card just because I couldn't help myself. Once I saw those adorable penguins, I knew I had to use them on a project. Each penguin on this card represents a member of my family (me, my hubby, and our 2 boys). Cute right?
What's your favourite kind of book to read?
Here is where I think the Tucson Police Department should have a heart to heart with Nancy – clearly telling her that there is information that they have that they do not want released because it could harm their investigation. Police tend to hold their cards close to their vest for a reason – not to deny Nancy the information, but to make sure that no information gets released that could benefit the person or persons who took little Isabel.
Eubanks
I like to pop this into my kitchen aid mixer, but be sure to not over mix or they will become tough.
But once you do, you’ll know how right at home he feels there. And why he chose Red Rooster.
It has taken me all day to work on this horrible, heinous crime. I despise crimes against the elderly, and this one is especially bad. I am still crying after reading all of this. Stabbing your grandmother to death…I have nothing good to say about him, except that he allegedly confessed. He may have remorse even, but that does not take away from the fact that he stabbed his grandmother more times than he could count. HIS GRANDMOTHER…whose last words were “I love you” – to the grandson who was brutally murdering her. Those words apparently saved other family members’ lives. That is when he called 911.
I decided months ago to make Tudor costumes to use in school events when I talk about Road to London. I began with a girl’s outfit which was a delight to make. My female character, Alice, was a serving wench and wore several layers including a red petticoat. I loved the petticoat - especially the fact that it was thought to have health giving properties.
Assault on Black Reach Orks:
And that's a problem a single board meeting could solve.
One of the other (of the many) delights of "Bombay's Republic" is that it is a story very much aware of itself as a story and, more importantly, aware of itself as a story about other stories. It becomes a paradoxical amalgamation of two Orson Welles titles: It's All True and F for Fake. Stories become realities.
In other words, by isolating and elevating phonics into this prime method, testing it and then describing it as 'reading', we are in serious danger of losing sight of what reading is for. Or put another way, we're in serious danger of producing some (how many?) five, six and seven year olds who can 'bark at print' but who are 'getting' very little from what they're reading. In which case, I and most of us would say, what's the point?
Step 6- Serving suggestions
Bears gash the forest trees
Please note the use of the word ”if” in that last paragraph. Douchebaggery is defined by intent — and that’s what I really want to talk about. But first, a little backgrounder…
Lets work together to sustain our community radio station
Like many of Noel Glynn’s horses, Becauseicouldntsee is named after song lyrics and the nine-year-old shares his name with a line in the Irish folk ballad Writing On The Wall, which was sung by Co Galway musician Sean Keane. The Beneficial gelding made three starts in point-to-points in the care of Glynn’s assistant Jason Titley, scoring on his final start in a Killaloe maiden in February, 2008. He made a winning debut under Rules, winning comfortably under amateur Liz Lalor in a Killarney bumper in July, 2009. He made one further appearance in a bumper, coming home fifth at the 2009 Galway Festival, before making his chasing debut in a three-mile beginners’ contest at Fairyhouse that November, falling two fences from home when contesting the lead. He was headed on the line to go down by a short-head to Lord Cebellino in another beginners’ chase at Navan in January, 2010, and also filled the runner-up berth in a novices’ chase at Fairyhouse the following month, finding Jagoes Mills nine lengths too strong. He made no mistake at the same course 10 days later as he easily accounted for his 15 rivals to beat Weatherbys Champion Bumper runner-up Corskeagh Royal by a distance. Following such an impressive success, the Nina Carberry-ridden Becauseicouldntsee was sent off as 13/2 second favourite for the National Hunt Chase at the 2010 Cheltenham Festival and he ran a superb race on his first start over the four-mile trip, going down by two and a quarter lengths to Poker De Sivola despite losing a shoe at the start. With the 2011 John Smith’s Grand National firmly on his agenda, Becauseicouldntsee made a low key start to the current campaign, finishing fourth in a Thurles hurdle in November – a race in which fellow Aintree hopeful Oscar Time was second. He duly built on that effort and posted another excellent effort over fences in the valuable Paddy Power Chase at Leopardstown’s Christmas meeting, as he stayed on well to take second behind Majestic Concorde. As a result of that effort he was fancied to run a big race at Aintree, but parted company with Davy Russel at only the second fence. He returned this season in a Grade Three novice hurdle at Cork in November when he finished last of the six runners, before going back to fences in the Hilly Way Chase on December 11, finishing third over the inadequate two-mile trip at Cork. He continued his Aintree preparation in the three-mile Paddy Power Chase over Christmas, but after being held up towards the rear he could never get into contention and fell at the second last when well held. Following the fall connections opted for another start over hurdles, this time at Fairyhouse, where he put in a pleasing performance to only be beaten four and a half lengths by subsequent William Hill Supreme Novices’ Hurdle favourite Galileo’s Choice. He returned to the Cheltenham Festival in the Fulke Walwyn Kim Muir Challenge Cup over three miles, one and a half furlongs, running a brilliant race to once again fill the runner-up spot behind Sunnyhill Boy with a bullish Glynn declaring: “It will be a different proposition with 10st 3lb at Aintree.
This week, out fun Teamie Lori Barnett, is hosting and she wants to see ***Sugar and Spice and Everything Nice*** creations for a precious little girl in your life!
First of all, I want to send a “well done” to Trooper S. Howard (#2073, Troop G) for his outstanding performance in handling what could have been a very serious situation.
I think it was the image of the man's drowning face that really brought it home to me. Up until then, my notions of warfare were very much based on old war movies, and boys in the playground playing out war fantasies. Ever since then, I've been simultaneously fascinated and horrified by the stories I've read about that particular war, which seems to have been more pointless then most.
4. Identifying & Interrupting Addictive Thoughts, Feelings, and Actions
As for this week, the ever-awesome ladies at Simon Says Stamp are throwing down one of their spectacular $25 gift certificates to the winner of Challenge 23! Happy holidays, for sure!
I weighed myself like ten times today. 134 leaning to 133. I hope that by my appointment on Thursday, I’ll be in the 120s. If not, then at least by the time my official weigh-in rolls around on Friday. I finally realized that I can’t keep bingeing and purging–like a dummy. If I binge and purge, I won’t do anything but stay the same weight, day after agonizing day. I would rather lose weight then remain the same, so that is why I think restricting is the way to go. If I do decide to binge and purge I have to limit myself to once a week–restricting on the remaining days. One yogurt or one packet of oatmeal per day will be sufficient.
We found Virginia after we had arrived but Jeremy had already gone back in looking for her. My pants were wet so we went back to the birth center and Asa waited for Jeremy.
Should I delay my future success to help someone?
It's remarkable that he ever made his way back from that place; even more remarkable that his eventual self-recovery led him to set up an addiction charity (CORE Trust) of which Princess Diana became patron. Jackie always had the eyes of a man who'd seen the extremes, who'd been to places I wouldn't want to go. You wouldn't think one person could cram so much life into a lifetime, but it's all there in the sublime music he went on to record since he came back – thirty-odd albums worth. Among the best of them (and they're all really good) were Fairy Tales for Hard Men, Creatures of Light and Darkness, Forbidden Songs of the Dying West and Elegy for Johnny Cash. Just go buy a few at random; you can't lose.
Okaaaay… not an easy angle to spin. Let’s check out what I was doing two years ago.
A holiday from school had provided ample rest - almost too much. For when given the chance to connect with their Maker on an outside autumn path, they want to stay. We give them no choice, and they comply, but their hearts are begging to stay within the shallow comfort they've created for themselves.
I Timothy 5:23
The other night in an unnamed palace hotel, the tiny owner of a very popular Paris nightclub tried to get into a hotel bar. As the bar was closing and said person was drunk and belligerent, he was refused access. At which point he behaved like a little baby and started screaming about who he was- what he owned, who he knew , etc. Said hotel didn't really give a toss, because they are used to real stars, and real important people..
■19% said being kept abreast of the organisation’s financial outlook
The story takes place in the dilapidated housing projects of Essex. Yes, this is another fine British film where the degraded urban landscape matches well the grim lives of the characters who populate it. Here is where we will find Mia, who lives with her little sister and her mother Joanne (Kierston Wareling), who is of an age that suggests she was about Mia's age when giving birth to her elder daughter, and of such dubious character that she spends most of the movie boozing with and bedding men. Wareling gives a brave performance in Fish Tank, somehow managing to imbue her off-putting character with enough humanity to keep her just on the right side of monstrous. When Joanne brings home a seemingly decent chap named Conor (Michael Fassbender, who is predictably great) whose attentiveness extends beyond his sexual interest in Joanne, the movie enters an even more troubling phase. At first, Conor's kindness makes Mia wary, but eventually he wears down her reserve and distrust, leading both Conor and Mia into some challenging territory. To say more would be edging towards plot spoiler-ville, but suffice to say that as things get complicated, the film's central relationships become explosive.
Fools do not treat Kṛṣṇa as Godhead because they are bewildered by ignorance and are so egotistical that they think everyone, including Kṛṣṇa, must be fundamentally just like them. The enlightened are not burdened by this ignorance, so they treat Kṛṣṇa as Godhead. But the fully enlightened become intoxicated by the universal desire to amplify the infinite all-expansive bliss of Kṛṣṇa, and thus submerge themselves into roles within the Divine Play. The Queens of Dvārakā take the roles of Kṛṣṇa’s wives.
Biba head of technical services Steve Foulsham says it’s a “false economy” to cut corners on this front.
Since I haven't gotten around to download the new cake pictures from the camera yet, I will start by posting the one I made from last year before I left on my trip, in no particular order (I have A LOT).
I tuck my hair behind my ear and cock it to one side. I barely breathe, do not move a single muscle as I wait for the car to crunch across the driveway gravel and pull out onto the road. As the silence of an empty house descends, I breathe again. And in one fell movement, I leap off the bed and crouch on the carpet, thrust my arm beneath my bed, and grab my scale.
We have a pretty good heat detection rate by just observing our cows because David does the majority of the milking. He also usually takes a few minutes in the morning and afternoon to just watch. In addition, we don’t have so many cows that he has trouble identifying which cows are showing the signs mentioned above. If he does miss actually observing standing heat, he might notice signs on the cows back end while she is milking that indicate she has been mounted many times.
"Even on the darkest of winter's days, my love for you grows like the flowers of your summer garden. In the midst of gloom, you make me bloom." I feel the same about him.
The only thing you need to do is follow my blog and leave a comment with your size and email so I can contact you in case you win. The giveaway will end in two weeks; on the 25th and the winner will be chosen randomly.
This is the day the Lord has made...enjoy it...and have a wonderful week!
After being directed to move the ice chest and cookies closer to the medic unit being used for firefighter rehab, Bob and I were invited to climb into their rig and out of the rain. Bob declined but I, being an EMT student and curious, took advantage of the opportunity to check out the rescue rig. One of the paramedics was inside getting things ready to check out the next crew due for rehab. He was friendly and made conversation with me. I told him I was an EMT student and he seemed genuinely interested, asking me several questions about what I had learned so far, where I went to school and how soon I would finish. Then he told me I could stay and help if I wanted to.
I guess I should tell you about me too. I’m your Mommy. I too, love to make people laugh. I think that as long as you have a sense of humor, you can get through just about anything. I’m so thankful for the strength and peace that God has bestowed upon me to get me through this time. I’m also thankful that I still have the ability to laugh despite the uncertain road ahead of us. I feel blessed to be your Mama and I’m excited to meet you. I promise to keep you safe and loved in the mean time, and I hope you got all the candy heart messages I’ve been sending you through your umbilical cord, CUTIE PIE. I love you, Nora Rose!!
The next morning, Wednesday the alarm goes off but your feet don’t hit the floor instead your hand hits the snooze. No big deal you can do your work out at night when you get home from work. The day turns into a mess, it seems that everyone is on your case, you just cant catch a break. All you want to do is get home and lay on the couch, as your resting your husband walks in with a pizza. At this point you have no will power, all the motivation you had on Monday is out the window. Before you know it you are sitting there in front of the empty box questioning if you just devoured the entire pie!
Here's another sample from my mullet mode. We'll call it Farm Mullet. I think Eggy has been on a diet - poor guy.
BJ (My extra comment) – Just wanted to say that this is not first and foremost an argument for Christianity. This is what I call a “pre-Christian” argument. Before you can suggest to someone that Jesus Christ is God, first it must be established that God actually exists (Heb 11:6 “…he that comes to God must first believe that He is…”). Once the premise “God exists” is established in someone’s mind/heart, then the road is clear to start having conversations with them whether or not Jesus is actually God.
Today I got a Letter of Recommendation from someone at a charity he works with. He said that Andrew has a Christ-like heart that cannot be measured in a tangible way and that his service to the families he meets with monthly is honorable to God.
First: chew lots of gum while you're writing. Not only does chewing gum help your neck to become toned. It's also great for toning the muscles you use when you sing. Spry is my first choice of gum. This gum has Xylitol in it, so it's very good for your teeth. Note, most name brand gums that contain fake sugars are bad for your health. Also sit ups are excellent for keeping your neck from becoming flabby.
Thanks everyone. Finals are imminent and I have been interviewing like mad for jobs (pray for me!!!) but I hope to have another giveaway in about a month!
and quite frankly, the hardest part about leaving our previous home was my garden that my husband and children made for me and that I had created, nurtured and watched grow over the years. The children also had their own portion of the garden where they were learning to grow fruits and vegetables as part of
Once he’s gone, I ask if anybody knows an anthropophagus. Again that pause, accompanied this time by a scowl. Sicama is far from the usual hiking routes, and the villagers are wary of our Indonesian guide — West Papuans, with good reason, view Jakarta with suspicion. “Not here,” they growl. Then they glance across the valley, to where the clouds have parted to reveal another village. “Over there, on the other hand, in Helugi…”
I was joking with my son about Black Sabbath’s performance, saying they will all be coming on stage with walking frames – they are aged. He said he wouldn’t mind he will enjoy the other rock.
It is not difficult to turn this form of reasoning, applied here to IP, so as to provide a corresponding justification for turning a blind eye to motoring speed limits, parking restrictions, fare-dodging, and tax-cheating, among other things. This is because it is a form of reasoning from which the consideration of any moral principles has been increasingly excluded.
I’m Jack Sh*t right now I’m…
SEC. 4. This Act shall take upon its approval, and the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder shall be in force and effect until the Congress of the Philippines shall otherwise provide.
Tuesday - 1.41pm
When you are angry, let me teach you to be serene.
Essential oils also can be used throughout the duration of an ear infection to help make the child more comfortable. Adding a few drops of eucalyptus oil to a humidifier will help break up congestion. Combining two drops of tea tree oil with twenty drops of olive oil makes an effective massage oil. Apply the oil in a light stroking pattern from behind the ears diagonally down to the collarbone. Warmed garlic and mullein oil (just a few drops) can be added into the infected ear to help with pain and inflammation. Make sure that you know the eardrum is in tact before you put any oil into the ear canal.
1 dates
Mummy was happy and rushed all over the place saying: “What peace and quiet! Isn't it lovely and warm!” And so she sat down at a big shiny table and began to draw. She took the lace tablecloth off and spread out all her illustrations and opened the bottle of Indian ink.
It is no secret how I feel about carbohydrate-rich foods. I feel they are foods of the Lord. Because how could it taste that good and not be holy? It's like wine. Jesus drank it. So should I. It's the holy thing to do.
Well, as stated above, it helps skin heal from the inside out, reduces inflammation and bacteria, is gentle, easily absorbed and helps carry nutrients to the deep layers of skin on a molecular level. MSM has been reported to eliminating wrinkles, brown spots, skin tumors and spider veins. It contributes to healthy skin, hair and nail by feeding into the body’s formation of collagen and elastin, which is what keeps skin resilient and youthful. In other words, it aids in anti-aging, brings life into the skin and contributes to its appearance.
Police have now taken all meat off the table for Muslims as food was being labelled as ‘produced in accordance with Muslim law’ but was not Halal.
Father, I pray this morning for a little more understanding of intercession. I believe in praying consistently for others. It is difficult, though, to always know how to pray in certain situations. We pray for healing, we pray for deliverance, we pray for material needs to be met. All of these things are good, but do we truly understand your mind and will for those for whom we are praying? That is what true intercession is about. I pray that you would help me to be fully identified with your interests in the lives of others as I pray for them. Let me not be swayed by sympathy. Let me not pray for someone to be delivered from a situation just because I feel sorry for them. It is more important to pray for your will to be done, and that is where discernment comes into play. We must be wise when we pray, not just throwing words out there.
I am not a rich man. But I am a fairly well-paid professional who does not smoke, gamble, entertain expensive women, or otherwise fritter away money. My wife is equally boring, so we normally finish the week with a little extra money. I would like to spend my excess money on a swimming pool and nice holidays. But I’m starting to think that I need to spend the money on a “Holiday Home” that could double as a Doomstead. I can tell you that I would far prefer the nice holiday in Cairns or Fiji, but we don’t always get the future we want do we?
2) Work only with receptive people. (Enthuse optimists rather than convert cynics)
The future revolves around forming communities. Bringing people together to connect and think and create and solve. It’s what Twist lives for and does every day. Because you have nothing if you don’t have community. And while there may be plenty of communities online, you can’t do anything if you don’t look up and talk to one another.
H: Uncle J played hockey with me
This spot above the ovens looks so much better too.
The peak of his critique came when he stated: "we cannot play this endless worrying game about saving the system. You should allow the system to destruct itself" and he gave the example of European Bankruptcy. "Don't be afraid of crisis. Let the system die, let it kill itself" he added.
So Saturday was a pretty interesting day. On a normal day it would just be Dreamer, Rove and myself just sitting in my basement playing Sigmas XBox 360 and whatever games we can snatch from my brother. We chill until about 9 or 10 which is when we would do a food run, which after we would come back for a movie until three or four. Well we kind of did that with a lot of other shenanigans in between. To start, no Rove. We drove to his house to get his and found him asleep. He woke up in his bed after we opened his bedroom door and told us he was working and that he couldn't hang out so we had to leave. He then proceeded to roll over and fall back asleep. After that, we hunted down the rest of our friends to see if they wanted to hang out instead. First stop was Spy who was at his new job. Unfortunately couldn't do anything until past Eight so we told him we would grab him later. Next we headed to Greendays place and snatched him instead.
Work colleagues perhaps best know the state of the Ghanaian weather more than I do, as they have seen many more of them than I have, but I cannot quite get my head round the fact that we have had no less than two rainy seasons all along?
All are merry in the May Queen’s court,
Thirty-nine weeks today. There was a time before pregnancy when I thought I'd never be any-weeks pregnant, and certainly a time during the pregnancy when I never thought I'd see this milestone. But here I am, a week before my due date, wanting time to both hurry up and stand still.
So to start, take a minute to read this post on Understanding Free Motion Quilting. This article walks you through exactly how free motion quilting works on your domestic sewing machine, how your stitches are formed, and why you may have issues with your stitches when you're just getting started.
I was a horny little cuss in high school. Horny, and guilty. *sighs*
They both emerged in the late 60’s down the Jersey Shore. What is it about those “dusty little seaside towns” and music?
I'd be a poor Brooklyn blogger, indeed (if you can call infrequent posts about the state of my physical health "blogging," of course), if I didn't at least mention the 2nd Annual Brooklyn Blogfest, which I attended with Kate last night at the Old Stone House in Park Slope. It was organized by Louise Crawford over at Only the Blog Knows Brooklyn, and a capacity crowd of well over 100 folks showed up for what was basically a two-part event. The opening half consisted of a more formal program with a number of speakers who talked about, well, blogs. And Brooklyn. And blogging in Brooklyn. Following this was an informal gathering with free food and drinks, and everyone just sort of mingling and introducing themselves, which I enjoyed very much (though we couldn't stay too long due to the late hour).
"Is that the baby?"
China's state-run People's Daily reported Sept. 13 (in its "Life & Culture" section) that air traffic controllers "observed with instruments" a UFO about 20 miles from Baotou, the largest city in Inner Mongolia, about 8 p.m. on Sept. 11. Flights were diverted to a secondary airport and three flights were forced to circle to avoid "collisions," a Baotou Airport spokeswoman said. Normal operations resumed after about an hour. The PD offered no details about the UFO.
As I was getting ready for work this morning, NPR aired a story about the California mom who sued the maker of Nutella for falsely advertising the chocolate hazelnut spread as a healthy choice. I smiled as I remembered that today is a staff Shabbat day and reminded myself to follow my mother’s mantra of “everything in moderation” and to try my hardest to use a reasonable amount of Nutella on my challah.
Tamarind - Tiny ball
Start: Seaford Station TV481991
What Your Child Won’t Learn at College: A Sense of Citizenship. In February 2010, the Intercollegiate Studies Institute released its annual report entitled, “The Shaping of the American Mind.” ISI researchers studied students’ knowledge of basic citizenship questions, along with 39 issue-based propositions and found that college graduates are dangerously ignorant of basic civics.
Ron: Besides my wife and horses, I love the movies. I go to probably 60 or 70 of them every year plus watching TCM and IFC on TV plus renting videos. (Just last night I saw “Near Dark” again, a terrific vampire movie set in the Southwest. Cowboy vampires in a van. Who wouldn’t like that?) I love to sit in a theatre with thirty or three hundred strangers. And when I’m working on something of my own, little bits of the film fly off the screen and stick to me and want to be used in the new book. A word or turn of phrase. Maybe the furniture in a living room. Maybe just a barrette in some girl’s hair. I almost never go to a movie and come out empty-handed.
And I’m looking for someone who takes me there
This time I don't get that reassurance. I am sorry I failed you, little girl. I hope someone else won't, and soon.
So often our sisters comfort others when their own needs are greater than those being comforted. That quality is like the generosity of Jesus on the cross. Empathy during agony is a portion of divinity! Elder Neal A. Maxwell (“The Women of God,” Ensign, May 1978, 10)
But the reason I'm asking is because if criticism of the President disqualifies an entertainer from performing in front of the military, then why did Bush-bashing celebrities perform on USO tours while Bush was President?
I had not thought death had undone so many.
Longer story shorter, I asked him out and we were married 8 weeks later. The kids liked him, and one even asked if he could be our dad when we had only dated for six days, so I knew I was in a win/win situation. I had only finished one puzzle.
Hello everyone. It's been a while since I've actually blogged anything. As you know, my latest book is coming out July 31st, Everblue. I'm so excited about it!
Turn your oven on at 170 degree Celsius.
Late in the evening, the results were finalized enough that it was clear my candidate would take one of the seats. It was also pretty clear the tax levy and bond issue would pass. There was some celebration at the watch party, and then the room started to clear out. I grabbed my candidate for a quick interview, and then Margaux and I headed back to the newsroom. Once there, I made a quick call to my other candidate, who we found out at that point had not been elected, for a quick reaction. Then we got to work typing up the best information we got from the evening, joined by the other election reporters and our Assistant City Editor. We sent all our information in to our ACE, and we put a story together in a little over an hour. Then we had another ACE look it over and sent it off to the copy desk. And finally, at about 11:30, we went to Waffle House for some celebratory greasy breakfast food.
. . . And then there are days where I’m sure I would have been better off staying in bed. Why not? It seems like most things go wrong, the day is loaded up with discouragement, and my failures get in the way of any usefulness I might attempt.
Bramley & Stanningley
Wow. Are you screwed.
Below, I’ve provided an insight into the creation of one of the game images: Dr. Argleton’s blimp. I’ve kept it brief… hopefully the explanation won’t induce too many comas.
now on that piece of string.
They burrow in the ground and undermine structures bringing destruction to gardens and orchards. They can be lethal to livestock because their burrow entrances are small and hidden. Animals often get their hooves trapped and end up with injuries that require medical attention.
Its a work in progress.....still need to add some french knots, beads and hand-stitching.
“Not an ultimatum, huh?”
SEVEN WONDERS
"We wanted to create something where people familiar with a cook book could just start making beer," explains co-author Stephen Valand. "We didn't want to say, first thing to do is go to a hardware store." The book describes how to brew beer in small, scaled down 1 gallon batches, a far more manageable size than standard five gallon recipes found most in home brewing books and magazines. At these small batch sizes, little specialized equipment is necessary to brew beer, such that "..if you've ever made a pot of pasta, you're in good shape".
Nellie went on a sleighing party after school. There is not very good sleighing on some parts of the road because the snow has melted.
I have longed for this piece ever since I saw it.
Hello, the current 7th graders going to be 8th next year! (Harris, Jasmine, Charleen, Stephanie, and Angel)
Funny story...
First and foremost I want to be very clear – I liked the work of being a comedian – I did not like the WORK of being a comedian. As stated in part three there are two work ethics required to make a go at this comedy thing. I was all about the writing and crafting of jokes, I loved learning how to bring that to the stage. I especially loved getting the reactions to the jokes, and the exercise of tweaking the joke even more. I really was not good at the other parts – the schoomzing, the promotion – the heavy lifting. And unfortunately in this country if it ain’t the comedian doing that work – it’s not really going to be anybody else doing it.
Between Donna and Susan and Kathy and Brenda,
During my NFL career, I learned that leadership is a trait that all athletes have deep inside of them. Unfortunately, I found that most players do not know how to apply their leadership skills. It is the inability to apply leadership that sets the regular NFL players apart from the true greats such as LaDainian Tomlinson, Marvin Harrison, Peyton Manning, and Brett Favre. These fine players are all strong leaders. It is their powerful leadership skills that inspire their teammates to come together as a team and play at the best of their ability – even when they are losing.
photo by Lon Levin
"Guilty as charged," he laughed.
cartoons?
Thursday: Off.
Hi guys, I'm back. Hope you behaved. I sure didn't.
Do you think you qualify? Sign up and show us!
– with suppliers.
Gradually the design improved as a result of lots of patient listening and long hours of work by Cady. Even though there was improvement, we couldn’t avoid the fact that many people held the original Cathedral in great affection. It held memories for them; it spoke to them of meeting God in a pixelated world and finding him to be real. For some it spoke of connecting with community on a deep level; or of returning to a faith that had been damaged in the past; or of finding faith for the first time. In order to ease the changeover, we worshipped in the new Cathedral on the building platform way above the sim for a couple of weeks. Even with that preparation, I know I felt sad when I watched the original Cathedral being taken apart. I also felt excitement as I saw the new one being put in place. I’m sure others felt similarly.
As random as it is, it's not a bad movie, it's just not I was expecting. Still though, Swap Meet is pretty original and fun. Watch it or be square. 6/10.
The training and experience seems to put a ceiling on the Voice. If you've had all that, and you still haven't cracked it, what more can be done with you? The conversation between Keith Urban and Megan Washington about the two 'pub rockers' summed it up. One would need to be constructed. The other deconstructed. Interestingly, Keith went against the trend and chose to 'crumble' rather than 'build' with his choice. In almost every other battle, the 'build' has won.
Bier Brewery Belgian Dubbel
If you work for a large company you might have little or no control over the music that pumps through your commercial spaces. In some cases, it may be so bland that you’re only aware of it around Christmas (the day after Halloween) when it becomes insufferable. Small businesses have all the music choices in the world. Some people shouldn’t have that kind of power.
.....because I didn't actually think I'd get chosen, sooooooooooo
PS. I think I must be tired from all of this spring cleaning!
The truth is that all independent, onlookers, whatever their political connections, can only be appalled at the greed and theft that has been perpetrated by Taib upon his own land and his own people.
For the rest of his life, Brod controlled Kafka’s output. He helped shape the first editions, as well as translations. He edited the manuscripts and arranged the order of the unfinished novels. Sparingly, he helped augment later editions with deleted passages, variant pieces, and foreword information. He played the role of gatekeeper to his friend’s work. He did well by Kafka, and most of Kafka’s reputation rests on Brod’s diligence. But, Brod’s influence came at a price. His interpretation of Kafka was limited, small, and provincial. Kafka was a more complex writer than Brod. Kafka possessed a keener literary vision than Brod. Kafka was great, whereas Brod was not. Brod was aware that Kafka was an important writer, but he also knew that the better Kafka’s reputation was, the more important he was. He was trapped by his friend’s success. Without Brod, there would not be a Kafka. But Brod never really relinquished his version of Kafka, and attempted to control the output so that his vision would remain dominant.
Crafting an art-damaged and intense presence, the group’s sound falls somewhere between The Animals, Motown and The Kinks. In person, the group’s soft-spoken demeanor instills a sense of alluring mystery, but on stage, Gringo Star explode. Never ones to hang on to the same instruments for too long, each member of the group sprints and hurdles from station to station, swapping out guitar for bass for drums for voice, keyboard for accordion, kazoo for tambourine. As a result, the band’s multifaceted musicianship culminates in dense and cerebral rock mantras that are hard-wired to the head and heart.
Now for those challenges:
A few weekends ago, I had a crazy weekend, filled with time spent with friends in the city, teetering around on heels that are way too high, not sleeping until at least 4 a.m., and somehow managing to avoid a hangover even though I was not exactly responsible (sorry, mom).
Filled with vinegar and his eyes.
I could enter the house of the Great King (Indra) and have half of his throne.
surprise: the shells
The books are basic counting and opposites books, but with illustrations from the other "big kid" Olivia books. I like the simple lines and colors of the series, and Ian can't-remember-his-last-name's subtle sense of humor is a refreshing change. Check them out.
The Golden Void Part II
American Beauty (Bruce Cohen and Dan Jinks, producers)
“Exactly”, I reply, laughing in agreement, remembering that there was no exclamation mark after the “No” the last time I’d peed on one of those blasted sticks. And I certainly felt like there should have been because I was so happy I nearly died.
AFTER THE FALL
Your Time Is Gonna Come
Add sweetened condensed milk, half-and-half, and vanilla to coffee in pitcher. Mix well and refrigerate at least 1 hour before serving.
flapping, from the pole.
CLICK. oh yes. The brain clicks, go look out of the front window. Hm. There's a hole by the gate. Yes, I'd noticed it, assumed it was to do with the new streetlights they're putting in. I go outside to look. Sure enough, there's a gas pipe visible, and a water pipe ohhh and in Margaret's driveway and front-garden next door, about three inches of ice.
- one that I'll get better at everyday - because that's what happens on new jobs. You start out not knowing quite what you are doing - people help you along and give you tips, but there is a lot of learning and troubleshooting. It takes a while to find your rhythm, figure out what things you are good at, and what things you need more help with.
There are so many options when it comes to heating a house. But most people have houses, not one small circular room with a loft. So, since I’ve never been in a home like the one we’re intending to build, the question becomes: what’s the right amount of heat for us, and the right tool to make it possible?
I guess it’s a matter of confidence. At least I know that this is just a passing phase. The first time you meet this, it can be devastating. If you’re facing that right now, have faith: it will pass.
The strength of a woman is not measured by the impact that all her hardships in life have had on her; but the strength of a woman is measured by the extent of her refusal to allow those hardships to dictate her and who she becomes.
Lindsay
His Father took over. Whilst his wife had not felt her son’s erect penis pressing against her due to the many layers of clothing she wore He noticed it immediately. David’s Father had been repressing his homosexual urges since he himself was a child, the night of his son’s conception being the most horrific of his life, and this blatant display of such inclinations spurred him to smack harder and longer than he would of otherwise, all the while David’s manhood pressing against his inner thigh. By the time he was done, after nearly 2 hours and 20 minutes, a queue of eager staff had begun to form, enrolled by Mother in the task, waiting to take over. When all the staff were spent a dozen villagers, who had been press-ganged by the Father after threatening their families with unspeakable acts, were waiting in line. When the last villager could take no more the stinging in the palm of his hand it was 4 in the morning. The heat from David’s arse could be felt across the room and the glow throbbed dully against the walls. The perversion of Tradition was the ultimate blasphemy in the family Fuckington.
Well, maybe not straight away, before we talk all about you, I just have to say that I am a big fan of Neil Gaiman. I loved his Books of Magic (not the Vertigo imprint that came out later - even though I did buy them), but I read a friend's copy and I haven't read it since. Can you just tell me one of your favourite scenes, please? So I can have that geeky 'Oh yes!' moment. Thanks.
Vacations.
There is soooo many fabulously talented and creative people that choosing just one winner was very difficult ....but on that note...
It is described as a demanding 5 day, 330km loop starting at Robina and returning to Nerang as passing through exciting towns like Murwillumbah, Nimbin, Rathdowney and if I am feeling fit enough Lamington National Park (though that may be a day by itself).
vacation schemes and /or training contracts?
Loosely translated, this means: How, shortly after Scutari was taken, what the local population thought of the Austrian press who covered it. In other words, blind and stupid (with my apologies to the ass.)
and only four Saxon Armoured
Morning! today I have a card to show you using a Penny Black stamp called "Good Friends" This was another card I made for a local shop in Taranaki. She sure was fun to colour, and that little chick is so cute!
The first book I read, Choosing Waterbirth, was a great primer and helped prepare the emotional side of my brain for this experience. This next book, however, took my preparation to a whole new level.
ATTIKA 7 features ex-Biohazard vocalist Evan Seinfeld, lead guitarist, notable songwriter and famed (Sons of Anarchy) motorcycle builder Rusty Coones, and bassist Tony Campos, founding member of Static X, who also currently performs in Soulfly, Prong, Possessed, Asesino and Ministry. ATTIKA 7 combines evil sounding riffs, melodic vocal lines, with old school guitar solos and undeniable grooves into a sonic frenzy of outlaw biker counter culture.
Everyone welcome.
Image of: Detroit OF Delmon Young apologizes after arrest
This is an aspect of life that I firmly believe in as well. Time cannot be turned around or replaced. It is very important that we spend time with spouses and spend time with our children. As they grow up we have to ensure that they become responsible and active citizens. A work/life balance is crucial and ensures that we work optimally.
That said, we had a great time, so who cares?
The study, which analyzed detailed records from the cases of eight people who went into cardiac arrest after receiving shocks from a Taser X26 fired at a distance, is likely to add to the debate about the safety of the weapons. Seven of the people in the study died; one survived.
Combine brown sugar, water, and butter in a small saucepan; bring to a boil. Cook 1 minute, stirring constantly. Remove from heat; stir in nuts and coconut. Spread over cake. Serve cake warm.
Definitely one of the series that I will be watching this spring for leisure purposes, yet may not be doing weekly review for it. Don’t just accept my impression on the show, go watch it, you’ll be impressed.
It is ruin of the learning and schools
Finally, because my mixture looked so crumbly, I added an egg (which made my granola bars intentionally un-vegan, unlike the original recipe).
… He was a smooth talking, greasy, head hunter that mortgaged the Gators football future for a pair of national championships to appease a rabid fan base that got way too used to winning.
And we arrived at Jakarta at 10.00am!! Actually Jakarta adalah sejam lebih lambat dari waktu Malaysia.. the flight tooks about 2 hours, so kiranya waktu malaysia is 11am while waktu Jakarta is 10am.. Got it?
The three recordings are
The reason we are so fond of them is that we have all USED them extensively, LONG before word processors existed, and are familiar and comfortable with them. Now, do I think that from an aesthetics standpoint that they are the best too? Absolutely not. In fact, I think that as portables go, they are actually less than average looking. Really, I do. But, if I want to or need to type something out, my Tower President is the machine I would go for every single time.
Also fun is all the different mah jongg sets out there. They can be all sorts of colors or have different patterns or pictures on the back. Me? I went with the gold glitter ones.
sandwich boards that union pickets sometimes wear.” Id. at 1014. As such,
Bayliss did not think Dhoni and Yuvraj’s unavailability would give a boost to his side. “They have only two players out of the team. We have five,” he pointed out.
Here is my layout for prompt #3:
851 D-III/22/1983. On Issues of the Day. Interview by Irving Ward-Steinman. KOBS-Radio, Alexandria, Louisiana.
It depended on location. The board is estimating 20 to 30 per cent of that $48 million crop is done.
it is a beautiful spring day, one in a series of beautiful days, and i woke up this morning feeling that it was time to sit and write about my True Colors experience. truth be told, i wasn't able to keep up with the regime all the way to the very end, as others did; yet, the group stalwartly and kindly continued to send my big ol' journal of Metallics (dubbed by Lynne as Heavy Metal, it is ENORMOUS...what was i thinking?!) around until everyone had done a page or two in it.
"Dear God, I know that I am a sinner and can never earn my way to your acceptance. I accept your free gift of eternal life, and put my trust in Jesus Christ. I ask Jesus to come into my life and into my heart, and to be my Savior and Lord. Thank you God for this wonderful gift."
At this stage the art in it's ink form looks sparse.
More than six months after she was tortured, Sori continues to be imprisoned in Chhattisgarh and has received virtually no follow up medical treatment for the injuries she sustained in police custody and the infections that have developed as a consequence. According to two people (one of whom is her lawyer) who were allowed to meet Sori in prison last week, her face was visibly swollen and her hands and feet appeared abnormally thin, indicating severe weight loss. Sori complained of a severe burning sensation while passing urine and of blisters on her thighs and her private parts. The magistrate in the Dantewada court, where Sori was produced earlier in the week, is reported to have remarked that she appeared unwell. According to the jail doctor in Raipur, Sori suffers from fluctuating and high blood pressure and from anaemia. Yet, on those occasions when she has been taken to the Raipur Medical College, she met with ridicule, indifference and inadequate care from the doctors and other hospital personnel. Police interference with the doctors is also suspected.
2. I could probably give Lindsey a run for her money as far as procrastinating goes. We should really find someone to shout at us and make us do posts and shit or it’ll just peter out into nothing and then where will we be? Back to trading snarky comments about Big Brother on Twitter, that’s where.
And since we’re only here for a while
Wear costumes: Costumes at French birthday parties are de rigeur. The child chooses his or her theme and guests arrive bedecked and ready to celebrate. It sets a festive tone and gets some extra mileage out of the duds in the dress-up bin. I once ferried Cole to a friend's home for a pirate-theme party only to be greeted at the door by his slightly sauced maman sporting an eye patch and a hearty glass of chardonnay. (For this one, I ignored the rules and stayed awhile..)
A few too many years ago, I told my parents I’d chosen History as my university major. They congratulated me. Then they asked what I planned to do with that degree—what I could do with it—because they weren’t sure. Neither was I. But I did study History, and never regretted it, and today, I blog about silent movies for free.
Jesus was saying that the kingdom of God would not come with observation in the sense of searching for it in various places. It would not come by searching. See verse 21 and Matthew 24:26-27. It would also not come with observation in the sense of demand. It would not come by demanding it in that present time. The Pharisees were demanding that Jesus show them the kingdom of God, and their demand would not be fulfilled. They had rejected Him as Messiah, so the kingdom of God was not going to come in that present time.
Healthy Hair Food No. 7: Whole Grains
I was sitting at a red light and looked over into the park next to me. A man was sitting on a bench in the rain. His dog was sitting beside him on the bench as well. They were both looking out over the park in front of them. Both looked very contemplative in their thoughts. I smiled and wondered what the man was thinking about then what his dog was thinking about. I wondered if they both enjoyed the cleansing feel of the rain as it washed over them. I like rain. A lot of people I know don’t care for it all that much, but rain itself, I like. I don’t particularly care for the wind and cold aspect of it…but generally I like rain.
*Bouillon cubes or broth (chicken or beef)
Everyone likes to be recognized and rewarded when they do something good. And when our actions are rewarded, we repeat them. We often express what students do wrong, but seldom reward and recognize for good performance or making gains toward learning targets. Great teachers openly recognize what students are doing to move closer to achieving the learning targets. Recognizing and rewarding good work along the way motivates students to keep practicing until they reach the final goal. Logan found a way to work with teachers and school officials to do this for his peers.
I did look over plungers and a snake. I simply don't see the plungers I like locally. Online I see a few that are possibly good, if there is only one way to be sure. What you often find at stores are things that shouldn't be sold even as novelties. They make a huge mess to no good ends. Of the two I bought, just to have something, anything, one has already broken despite offering almost no real suction power. The handle and plunger itself became detached in such a way that the whole doesn't function. At least I was able to get the handle to screw back in enough to remove the thing. Garbage. As for the snake, it depends on where you look. And, don't use snake as your search reference, use auger, then maybe sift the search to bathroom or plumbing. My guess is I can buy one of those locally and be more sure about the purchase, if I might pay a bit more.
It was hard achieving the bumps in her dress so that it looked like it went in and out but I think I got there in the end.
The other question, of course, was how the hell I would react if it transpired that their beer was actually pretty decent? I'd potentially be forced into a very tricky corner.
Happy Friday :)
What makes this yoga so powerful, in my opinion, is summed up by one word: vision. Not just everyday vision but ultra-vivid perception, like suddenly having a lens that magnifies your moment-by-moment experience. Sometimes the lens is tightly focused on the tiny details; other times, it’s a wide-angle view that takes in everything. This is the power of the focused gaze, or drishti, as it is called in Sanskrit. It resonates on many levels.
Sarah (The Swag Hag) Palin
And I have to admit its a kind of a sexy accusation. And I also know that its true. This is not news to me. I do like a crisis. I operate at maximum efficiency in the face of catastrophe. My aim is sure. My hands are steady. During rehearsals for the Super Bowl Half Time Show at Joe Robbie Stadium in Miami, I was a wreck. I was the PSM (production stage manager), the head honcho. Under my command I had a Technical Director, 2 Stage Managers, 1 Costume Designer, a crew of about 50 Production Assistants, 200 dancers, and about 1,000 cast members including a team that was in charge of "cold fire."
I'm not at all ready for winter and am quite enjoying the warmer October weather we've had this week. However, I did finally get my KAndrew Winter Wishes stamps recently. They had a little adventure. Short story even shorter, they spent some time in the ditch across the street from my mailbox. The mailman thinks that the door was blown open and they flew out and spend some rainy cold days in the ditch. Luckily the field had already been harvested and the stamps were well packaged. They were completely undamaged and in perfect condition.
To keep things simple on this test-run, I planned on grabbing just four grocery items–a case of Great Value canned salmon, a bag of Great Value pinto beans, a container of Great Value oatmeal and (my exception to my one-item rule) a case each of Great Value canned spinach and Great Value canned sliced carrots. I use each of these items on a regular basis, so of course I thought everything would be right where it always was. Boy, was I wrong. And I didn’t realize how wrong I was until I got to the fifth Walmart.
My students are Earth. They have one orbiter – the Moon. That moon is those few people who always read their blogs and always support them. In some cases the moon is me (their teacher), or their parents, or their friends. That moon is going nowhere and will always be a loyal follower or orbiter for their blog. But how can we attract – and most importantly KEEP orbiters?
It’s Alanna’s struggles as much as her adventures, that make this such an enduring story for me. This is a fantastic adventure story all around, of fighting bullies and mages, and demons—but all of Alanna’s triumphs are rooted in the work and study she puts in, day and night, studying and practicing, and practicing, and practicing, to be the best. Because, while Alanna has a natural aptitude for most of the knightly skills she learns, she quickly finds that there are older and bigger boys who have already learned what she is learning now, and she can’t just rely on her natural aptitude if she wants to be the best. I find myself motivated and excited and energized every time I read Alanna’s story—wanting to go out and have my own adventures, to travel the world, to learn new things.
i kinda wish i lived in america where sex writers mean something. enough to make a focused living off of, instead of trying to squeeze everything in into a working whole...
Where the Word, who makes all things new, resounds:
Or see the perfect "British racing green," comfortably worn leather chair, (and ottoman!) for $200, and not pull the trigger on it???
Really fun.
Hello Dolls! I wanted to do a giveaway with this fabulous piece from Nicole Richie's House of Harlow 1960 collection known as the leather station statement necklace!
Just like witches at black masses
And then there is Dhritarashtra (Darshan Jariwala). In Tharoor’s telling, he is the first prime minister of India, blind to the crumbling edifice around him. That’s the stuff of Nehruvian tragedy. Here, Dhritarashtra is an afterthought.
I dunno. I guess I could incorporate it. Hmmm...
Even then her instincts told her to be braver
As came the new song, Le Tour du Monde d’un Gamin de Paris… (The tour of the world of a boy from Paris)
The natural response to this extraordinary level of pain and torture Dr. Mengele had perfected was dissociation of the conscious mind. In that state, victims can be subjected and programmed with secret alternative personalities with keys and triggers.
Perhaps you're one of those aspiring writers out there who doesn't believe in entering contests. I mean, why should you have to pay money to have your work read, right? Well, I hear ya, but you have to keep one thing in mind if you're looking for credibility in the publishing world —
I don’t want to hear it I don’t want to go home since my dream is still out of reach…
What I need is a “Jesus moment,” a time when Constantine saw the Chi-Rho in the skies – well, that’s one story. Others say the third century Roman Emperor dreamed of divinity. In a more personal relationship, I’d like a Roman Emperor to make edicts that command everyone reads my writing. I should have wrote that in my Pazuzu Trilogy , but the Church had banned books. Yeah, I’m not beyond mandating an Inquisition and forcing everyone to enjoy my fiction. I’d even say thanks to the Antichrist if he promoted my book. While we’re waiting for his or her arrival, I’d suggest everyone get started reading, just so that people finish my Pazuzu Trilogy before the Apocalypse.
The burger was created solely to break the world record and to act as a publicity stunt however in order to meet the requirements laid down by Guinnes this monstrosity has to be on the menu at the cafe for at least a year.
Looking like it's just comprehensively bettered by most hot hatches like the mitsubishi motors financial and the www mitsubishi motors it jazzed-up by motorsport spec high-flow fuel injectors. A big bore stainless steel exhaust and an independent multi-link set-up at the mitsubishi motors pakistan in the mitsubishi motors financial a sophisticated traction control systems to the mainstream family hatchbacks it's targeting but purely on a cheap budget may need to chat again to their Bank Managers but theres no doubting the mitsubishi motors financial that the mitsubishi motors america an essential lifestyle accessory for young trendies with people and bulky items to move around. Open the mitsubishi motors financial aboard and youll be exploring the mitsubishi motors financial of the mitsubishi motors financial. Of most interest to those who are after a few bags of pea gravel or scoops of topsoil for the mitsubishi motors us of 2001 sales had more than a quarter turn of steering lock is applied, the mitsubishi motors financial a lowly 2,000rpm, the mitsubishi motors financial is available where you need it most. Fitted to a small Mitsubishi? I may be going out on a limb here but the mitsubishi motors financial, variable injections still help produce respectable urge through the mitsubishi motors corporation and fuel economy and performance across the mitsubishi motors ireland, blending rocket-ship pace and massive grip with surprising civility.
Chicken breast cutlets breaded in panko and fried, green beans, Stove Top stuffing
What if we really ARE busy (like when I am on the phone) and can't respond immediately?
8. "Sensi"
Unschoolers might learn about one or all of these instead of taking a class on biology. Or they might learn copious amounts about some specific aspect of biology (e.g., cellular mitosis) instead of taking the "quick dip" survey-style course that was all that was offered at my high school.
The next days i didnt have any contact with this man and just acted like i was a robot. Didnt speak to anyone just did my jobs and cared for the baby.
You want to "level the playing field". Certainly jobs are hard to find, they're hard to find for good, hard working people. They're even more hard to find with multiple piercings, tattoos, dirty hair and an arrest record. College doesn't guarantee you a job, though it greatly increases your chances. Like anything in life, it has its rewards, it has it's risks, and it has it's price.
the weight and heat of the netbook on my lap
Next Week: Heart-Shaped Box
Lastly, readership of Travalanche has doubled and then quadrupled in recent months. These wise, discriminating people know where to go for forceful, literate, comical (and honest-to-a-fault) theatre, film and book reviews, articles about famous vaudevillians, and a cornucopia of surprises delivered daily. Don’t be caught napping. Be sure to subscribe though an RSS feed to get the content shipped right to your electronic door. . Don’t miss out!
R12- 2sc in each sc (12) Mark Row, Change to shirt color
Trader Horn was the first big budget Hollywood film shot on location. The production was a disaster. They came back from Africa with scene after scene of inaudible dialogue, a star infected with malaria, and the suitcases of crew members devoured by crocodiles and trampled by rhinos. They also had miles of jungle footage, way more than could ever go into a single movie. Trader Horn came and went, but to capitalize on all that location shooting they’d already paid for, MGM rolled out Tarzan the Ape Man the following year. It was a cheap hit that spawned five low-budget sequels.
Universally, Peace Corps volunteers crave food. I have dreams about it. Vivid dreams where I belly flop into a bowl of ice cream off of a hot fudge brownie diving board. Sushi. I have a long distance relationship with Sushi and we are not communicating well.
Suddenly, the desperate voices of my characters have stilled. They’re waiting.
The most frustrating part of this ruling is that there are many pit bull and pit bull mix owners who are highly responsible and who will get swept up in this bright line rule. Likewise, the ruling will not affect the highly irresponsible owners of dogs who are not pit bulls or pit bull mixes. Dare I even mention the issue of how a court is to determine whether a dog is a pit bull or pit bull mix.
Clootie Dumpling is a traditional Scottish dessert made with flour, breadcrumbs, dried fruit, suet, sugar and spices, the beer has been produced to match these flavours. Bearing these flavours in mind, when I opened the beer I was expected a rich, thick dark stout or porter. Instead the ale is toffee in colour and light in texture. I also expected a thick, heavy head but was instead met with a frothy light foam that quickly disintegrated.
And no, Joyce, I am not kidding about standing on your big stamps. I actually prefer it to the inking-rubber-side-up method because it gets me moving and practicing balance. *snort*
- choose a gift for the poor from the wishing tree today
Neneh Cherry I’ve got you under my skin S
All of this is so overwhelming. Bottom line for me is that humans are all flawed to varying degrees… many are selfish and very harmful to others. I am trying to figure out how to navigate my situations and find healthy allies. Our needs – mine and amazing’s – were so strong for each other that we could not maintain a “friendship” without risking more than that… which could at least initially detrimentally influence everything. Perhaps we should have let it somehow, or should one day. I do not know the answer.
Tiesto feat Kay – Work Hard Play Hard
A heavy week for the calendar opens quietly. Wednesday is arguably the most significant as “Bernanke-speak” and Fed thinking is revealed. Tuesday’s New Home Sales and Thursday’s Jobless Claims will jiggle the market as well. Finally, Friday’s GDP number will tell all. Hint: for the bigger picture pay attention to any announcements revision numbers as revised numbers make for a clearer picture of trend. Recall that our data points are somewhat fractured, mixed, and leaning to fraying at the edges of economic strength.
If you or your groom are planning on having your bridal party spend the night with you give them a heads up that there are to be no wild parties planned, no surprises.
Simon and Cho are friends off the ice and said they enjoyed battling it out physically and intellectually.
Construction on a new bridge is now expected to begin in spring 2013 — a year ahead of schedule, thanks to $460 million made available for the job by Gov. Cuomo’s New York Work initiative.
In my world view, when someone does me wrong, I change the circumstances of my life so they cannot do it again. My focus is on me, and what I can change in myself or my life circumstances. Those are the only things really under my control
We seem to be re-enacting the story of the Roman Empire, which in its decadence imported subject races to do the menial tasks.
Those with paruresis must be goal oriented. We mustn’t look too far into the future. Of course it is important to have long term goals (for example, being able to pee at a concert), but ultimately how the war is one is through battles. Short-term goals are the catalyst that lead to more lasting and impacting long-term goals. If paruretics do not learn how to take everything one step at a time just as the alcoholic, they will suffer the same fate, that being the relapse.
If I help you, it has to be on my terms. The seriousness in his voice an alien sound to her ears. "If I help you . . you have to follow my instructions. This isn't a video game and nobody must know your source."
I don't have anymore weddings to go to until 2011. I'm gonna miss them kinda.
I'm quite sure that I forgot things in all of the iNSD excitement so stay tuned during the day today and for the rest of iNSD for details. We're planning a guest CT spot contest so I know that you'll love that! :)
You didn’t know anything about George W. Bush, either, even after he’d spent four years as president. Did you vote for him?
I had the chance to get my astrological chart done this year, not only to understand more about Astrology for MAID OF SECRETS, but also for another writing project I’m working on. I learned all sorts of fun things about the planets and how they may be impacting me, about what I might learn in this lifetime and what my future may hold. I even was given a few of those ‘astrologically ideal dates’ that had Queen Elizabeth so intrigued.
Miguel came home and relieved me to go to the gym. I started with a 25 minute run on the treadmill. It was hot and I just didn't feel like running outside. The run was friggin' awesome!! I started at 5.0mph, then went up to 5.5, my "normal" pace these days. At the 10 minute mark I pushed it up to 6.0mph and I felt really good. I decided to go for 10 minutes at that pace, which would mean a mile at 6mph. I did and I still felt good enough to keep going. I ended up staying at 6mph for the rest of the run, meaning I ran for 15 minutes at 6mph! I felt so happy. It feels so good to be getting speedier. I think the treadmill, even with a 1% incline, is a bit easier than the reality of outside but I'm still pleased. The first time I ran at 6mph I felt like my legs were moving like egg beaters, but today it felt smooth and doable. Yay!
We needed to find a home for stuffed toy bears which the grandchildren all seem to want to take to bed with them when visiting, plus a wombat, a penguin and Tanya's earless lamb, and now they're keeping the top shelf dust free.
Today, I took a NJ Transit bus to Warwick, NY (I don't know why a NJ bus goes to NY). I got off the bus and walked about a mile to Maskers Orchard, a really beautiful pick-your-own apple orchard. You pay $25 per bag and can visit the country store that sells preserves, jams, doughnuts, pies, and all sorts of other apple-related baked goods. I got some cider doughnuts and hot cider. It was really delicious, and everything was sold at wholesale prices.
I had indian food for lunch today for a co-workers birthday.......Its amazing, you should try it if you get the chance (very rich though......a bit mean to the tummy)
At first her eyes were opened wide in surprise, but she embraced him and the gentle kiss turned into a full out snug. Finally, Jude seemed to get a hold of himself and backed off.
Susanne Vielmetter Gallery
The Basel show features all manner of weird and wonderful animals, from mammals to marsupials.
I was impressed by how graciously our side reached out and genuinely listened to these kids, even though it must have been difficult to let them drone on spewing school-sanctioned propaganda, but they did. They listened.
Santiago – one of the high school students who spends afternoons at the library – offered to help Will with the assembly (by “assembly” I mean, shoving the wheels into the legs – which took more effort that one might think).
Light and lively, with short chapters, this book takes us on a journey. Along the way we hear imaginary (but oh so familiar) conversations between parents and small children; between parents and their friends, worrying about their slightly older children's lack of interest in reading; between a despairing teacher and his sensible wife. And finally we hear the excited voices of a class of stroppy teenagers discovering that books contain stories they want to read.
All in all, it wasn’t too bad of a day. My goal today was to do my morning yoga routine, have an entirely vegetarian day and keep myself hydrated. I am really getting used to waking up at 5:00 am to do yoga; this morning I could’ve easily rolled over and gone back to sleep, but I forced myself out of bed. I managed to have an entirely vegetarian day, although dinner wasn’t exactly the healthiest (Indian food – naan and rice sure are yummy, but not very healthy!)
For example if your walls are 8 ft tall and the roll of electrical tape is 60 ft then divide 60 into 8 and you will see that you can get 7.5 stripes on your wall. I would round down to 7.
Ergo, if you; your team, department, division or company has started to plateau or recede; it’s time to shake it up, re-engage the minds of your greatest asset (your people!) and move from mediocracy to meritocracy.
My choice is often throwing up, but occasionally I exercise to burn off the calories from the food I stuffed in my mouth.
Christopher Joseph Blackwell, 42, Patterson, N.Y.
I wanted to be sure to include both my tot and preschooler in this year's Christmas gift. So my tot helped me mix up the dough and my preschooler did the decorating. I have to credit Mom to 2 Posh Lil Divas with this recipe. It worked perfect! The only change I made was adding several drops of green food color to the recipe. I've included a quick version of this recipe below, but if you're looking for excellent step-by-step directions check out Mom to 2 Posh Lil Divas!
To us, the entire story is fantastic. But to the sages hearing this story from Sūta, many of the details were contemporary and immediately real. The powerful weapons of ancient warriors, for example, were practical realities to them. So gestures of disbelief showed on some of their faces. “That weapon is unstoppable except by another instance of itself! How could it have suddenly been dispelled, and even a fetus was not injured in the blast!?”
Card # 1475: Kevin Millwood, 2006 Topps Opening Day Red 126, Texas Rangers (1475/2006)
The first impression means everything not just in real life but also in fictional situations.
The article is very absolute that despite all the technology and communication at our fingertips, we are experiencing unbelievable loneliness that is making people miserable, and the author calls out our almost incessant feelings of unprecedented alienation, an epidemic of loneliness, and social disintegration.
"Bottoms up Professor!"
Jonathan Wells,
Yoochun: Okay, we know!
We have a stellar group of Graduate Assistants coming back to help us with all the details of planning, presenting, workshopping, trouble-shooting, helping new students get adjusted, etc. I don't know how we would do it without them, and I love hearing them read from their works-in-progress. Every summer our residency also coincides for the first weekend with the Alumni Mini-Residency, so I get to see former students and get an update from them about how their writing (and their families, jobs, etc.) are going.
Blogger, in its wisdom, has seen fit to change the interface for posting. The explanation: the usual blather about "the completely new, streamlined blogging experience that makes it easier for you to find what you need and focus on writing great blog posts." Through unfamiliarity with the new streamlined super-duper 3-D turbocharged look, I found myself unable to make a small change to the sidebar by editing the template, got flustered, and must have made a wrong turn. The old template disappeared in a puff of smoke, leaving what you see now.
On January 24th, students at Wakefield participated in a walkout. They were subsequently suspended. Rather than stay home on Thursday, January 26th, they spent the day attending Mexican American Studies classes at the University of Arizona, including Roberto Rodriguez's class. Among the speakers Rodriguez had lined up for that day was Simon J. Ortiz of Acoma Pueblo. Rodriguez has been writing about the attacks on the MAS at TUSD for some time at his blog. In his post on Thursday, he writes that just as his class ended that day, they learned that the suspension of the students had been lifted.
My heart saddens as tears fall
After that a guy finally made it to the front to help me. I picked out my barn and even got to pick out the roof color.. THEY are gonna come and put it together for me. Metal roof! Love the Red Metal roofs.. I know I am a dork.
While yet incessantly asking still I adhere to my city,
Caster kill games get old very fast. More so, there are bad matchups and there are worse. Caster kill exaggerates these matchups in a very clear way. The rock-paper-scissors aspect of the game comes to the forefront in such a way that when a bad matchup is set one player will just have no fun at all. It is great to learn, specially to learn what your models can do and when, but after a while it will be about the best list.
Every spare minute I am crocheting. I can't wait to finish a row, so I can see what the next colour will look like. I love the fact that I can take it anywhere, even the beach and get a quick fix.
We were excited to finally get to the cottage we had been coveting, and when we walked in, it was everything we thought it would be: a private place that was romantic and sexy at the same time.
What they are really saying is “How dare you?” ....“You have no right!” ... “There is nothing you can do about it, as indigenous Britons you are supposed to bend over and take it just like you have done for the last forty years!!”.
In a short period of time our community has seen a hand full of children taking their own lives as a result of society telling these children who they were, and now they are gone. This hit home when last week my daughter’s, friend’s little brother took his own life. I look back to my self perception as a teen and even younger. I was overweight and was teased a lot for that, making me believe that was who I was and allowed that to define me. In my adult life I found a picture from my junior year of high school, and was shocked to see how skinny I was. I had bought into the fact that I was the fat kid and NEVER saw myself as the young man in my picture. It is my job as a parent to help my children really know who they are and TRY to educate them how society and peers can teach unhealth, but do not let that define who you are. It is also my duty to teach my children that they are exactly who God created and how He loves the person He created. Teaching kids to love God and learn from Him, will put strength and direction in their lives, and THAT can help define who they really are. “All your children shall be taught by the Lord, and great shall be the peace of your children.” Isaiah 54:13
Alona?
Two viking units manage to cross the river on the Scottish left. Is it too late though?
Hi There. I'm one of Phoenix's managers and just wanted to say how much we all loved the performance of Lisztomania. I wept within the first 30 seconds! It's absolutely stunning, the arrangement is fantastic and the singing is just incredible.
* Assistant Fabrication Manager
Here’s the idea: produce a weekly podcast that tries to find a few of the best bits within the skeptic podcasts for that week, plays clips, and generally gives an overview of what is going on in skeptic podcasting. You’d need a team of skeptics who would divvy up the 75+ active podcasts in English so every episode is listened to by at least one member of the team. (Naturally there will be some overlap on the more popular shows). The team would make notes during the week as to standout moments, top news stories, things that have changed and so on. This could be done over email or even something like Google Docs or Evernote for shared note-taking.
Fowler says the CPC is satisfied with the slight change in wording, which now reads, “An amendment to the Colorado Constitution changing the existing evidentiary requirements for foreclosure of real property and in connection there with requiring the evidence be filed to sufficiently establish a party’s right to enforce a valid recorded security interest prior to the foreclosure of any real property.”
He taught us to always be courteous, to speak clearly and correctly, to always say "Sir," and to always say "please" and "thank you". Despite his own 'School of Hard Knocks' background - or more likely, because of it - my Dad is an optimist; he taught me that as hard as this World is, it isn't always 'Dog eat Dog', it's more like 'Friend Help Friend', and that if you worked hard and played it straight and true, somewhere down the line somebody would be willing to lend a hand when you needed it.
And really, a meal cooked for you always does seem to taste that much better.
Things are going well for Corey so far. The ship will probably leave Lithuania for Cape Canaveral later this week. We’ve been communicating by text, although I may have accidentally dialed him as his phone showed a missed call from me. We did speak by phone yesterday, but we’re trying to keep calls to a minimum because of the cost.
So that is my story.
yet I will rejoice in the LORD,
2) “Self” is allowed to rule. Discipline and self-control are not exercised.
the highlight of the room is the tree~
If you live or are visiting the Charlotte area, your life experience is not complete until you go visit Not Just Coffee! Go have one of their oh so amazing cappuccinos, teas or latte's and enjoy the flavor. They are located on east 7th street in the Uptown area. Here is their page, NJC!
The Little Drummer Boy ... ABC Family ... 7 AM
‘We were all interested in clarifying the matter, but unfortunately we were not able to find out anything about it.’
Women who have had that moment of consciousness raising followed by the moment of panic about exactly how huge it all is often feel an intense urge to retreat–to forget the reality they’ve seen and go back to living inside the Matrix. They’ve seen exactly how dire the consequences are for living outside those boxes, and aren’t yet ready to take those risks. Yet, they also can’t really unsee it. So what do they do? They convince themselves that they have a choice. They convince themselves that their ”choice” to continue to follow the cultural influences pressed upon them is something they made entirely on their own. They know the truth, they insist, and thus the fact that they’re choosing to do what their culture wants of them is a matter of free will. They’re not stupid. They get feminism. They understand that the world is a sexist place. They choose to ape those sexist structures with full knowledge and autonomy.
“No? Why not? If someone tells you how they commit a crime that they claim they didn’t do… that just doesn’t make sense.”
For us, trying to find Collin interesting presents is quite a challenge & results in moderate panic starting in July....
He loved the butterflies,
I hope you all have an amazing Christmas and get to spend lots of time with your loved ones!
Designing a Digital Book Cover:
Roughly a decade behind the times, I've finally created a blog. In my defense, however, my newspaper columns at my former gig were posted online.
Thankfully, the reveal of Waterfield as a time traveler is addressed quite early in the episode. And through quick thinking and deception, Waterfield is able to knock out and bring The Doctor and Jamie back to 1866 with him. They both awake in a Victorian manor with severe headaches. The Doctor soon meets Theodore Maxtible, who claims responsibility for the abduction. We also learn that Waterfield and Maxtible are at the mercy of The Daleks, and that Waterfield’s daughter Victoria is being held prisoner to ensure cooperation. We then cut to a scene in which we see Victoria being menaced by a Dalek who chastises her for not eating enough.
I miss holding a new cd with my own two hands, struggling to release its surely life-altering beats from their shrink-wrapped catacomb.
Why does the entire green spectrum, which now incorporates most conventional parties across Europe, deny the most obvious of truths? To play lethal games with our energy systems in order to honour the whimsical god of climate change is as intelligent and scientific as the Aztec sacrifice of their young. Actually, it is far more frivolous, because at least the Aztecs knew how many people they were sacrificing: no one has the least idea of the loss of life that might result from the EU embracing “green” energy policies.
Anyway, I will attempt to keep my pragmatic tendency in view in order to keep this blog from being merely a bitch-session. This is because there are two sides to the Gospel. One side reminds me that we live in a fallen world full of fallen people-of which I’m the worst. And the other side reminds me of the hope that Christ will redeem it all-”every crooked thing straight, every rough road smooth” (to steal from my friend Mr. Hall… who probably just stole it from some book anyway).
Trio Hoboken: Saskia Lethiec (violin), Eric Picard (cello), Jérôme Granjon (piano)
…cute. But he also looked relaxed and happy. And that’s how I like to see him.
I have goals on my life, I’m putting in effort in helping others, both at work and at church. But this is rewarding me too!
18.) “And maybe what she said, which makes her particularly credible, is, ‘These guys didn’t ejaculate on or inside of my body,’ which means she deserves extra credibility because no one’s suggesting that she lied about whether there would be DNA found on her person.”
In the U.S., the only person trained and authorized to give legal advice is a lawyer, also referred to as an attorney-at-law. No other person is competent to give legal advice. If a non-lawyer gives legal advice he or she can be charged with the unauthorized practice of law in the state.
This is essential for any spiritual undertaking. If you know you, then you can dissolve the parts of you that do not work for you. The “shadow” aspects which are really misinformation passed onto the brain through blocks in the emotional body, occurring through the misunderstandings of situations, trauma, or past life karma.
Please contact me via email (link is in my profile) with your mailing address. I hope you love the bath and shower gel as much as I do!
A charming little video of home-truths.... 'til next time x
An end to another long week is upon us and deservedly so in our book, we all deserve a little “me” time and rest. Be safe this weekend and ENJOY!!!
...because it was so freaking good and everyone needs to try it!
I just dont seem to have the patience for the drawn out plots
We lost a chicken. It happened a week ago, we'd been letting them out of the pen to free range it for a little while and when Dirk went to put them up, two were missing. The rest were terrorized. Some were sitting in the coop, not budging, and two were on top of each other cowering in a corner of the pen. Dirk had to pick them up and put them inside, so obviously something got after them. We looked everywhere but two were just gone. Dirk found a pile of feathers as evidence that something happened. I was sad, we'd finally got them all laying! I was sad for the bird and sad for the loss of eggs.
Use a lot of Lotion - Out in the sun and at the solarium use high factor SPF’s to gradually build your tan.
More than evens up the score.
6s-
by Theodore Deacon, producer of EMG’s upcoming baroque opera production: A Day on the Town, A Night in Hell, on April 15, 16 and 17 at the Moore Theatre. Click here for more information about performances and to buy tickets. To read part one of this article, click here.
Am I blue
Between writing, homework, approximately thirty minutes of cleaning, and eating, I found myself thinking. It was of my usual topics, of course: life, friends, the way fate tends to treat me. Good things that have occurred in the weeks that have elapsed. The events that will keep me from burying my head beneath the dirt again.
So stand up and be counted, take your place amongst the ranks--
A pessimist sees only the dark side of the clouds, and mopes;
This raises a question: Is it worthwhile to arrest victims of forced prostitution, thus further traumatizing and victimizing them? Additionally, should we prosecute those who choose to become prostitutes as harshly as we prosecute clients?
I sit here now thinking about past. If I even had any chance to make things better in that time. I know and will always say I’m not the best and I have a lot of room for improvement, but I’ve always given some clearly stated chances to people that if they are doing something I don’t like and they don’t change, the result could be …. But some people, I can’t really appreciate their style. They like to hit with a surprise like “here’s all you did and this is what is happening now.” Then some don’t even have logical reasoning in their list of supporting “facts.” It can truly be a “blame game.” Imagine listening to someone giving a reason that they don’t believe in the relationship and you can quickly and easily say “so, why were YOU always doing that exact same thing? And very often!” In that situation the expectations are so toxic and annoying that there is no chance for peaceful communication between two. Anything can be resolved and improved between two people that love each other and have a desire to keep God at the center, but sometimes there are just personality traits that have no desire to change. Maybe I’m guilty of that actually.
He insisted that America’s founding fathers would have been on his side. “Our dead revolutionaries would soon wonder why their country was fighting against what appeared to be a revolution.” He challenged those who called him anti-American: “I say, don’t blame me for that! Blame those who mouthed my liberal values and broke my American heart.”
Now the concentrations of these products can be changed to meet your hair type. I have pretty oily hair so I needed this concentration but if your hair is dry/normal then you might be able to cut back on the amount of baking soda. That part of this process is a personal thing and is only discovered by trial and error.
...an electric hot water kettle thing, Starbucks instant coffee and a Scentsy warmer to make things smell fab. A ridiculous amount of quilting magazines and an old school set of canisters, which were found at the junk store too. Why do you ask? In the canisters are some people snacks, along with kitty and doggie treats. You saw the unruly gathering of animals hanging around, and that was not even the half of them, they get hungry.
Genre: R&B, Blues, Jazz
2. I Didn't Know What Time It Was
* Grapeseed oil
3. Tight fitting jeans are not allowed. By the way, this rule only applies to the men. Women are free to wear any and all jeans, as long as they are tight fitting. Men’s jeans must be at least 3 sizes too large, and should be falling down around their hips. If any of the men wear high waisted pants, they will be marked as a nerd.
So what is my role? God calls us to be involved. Our roles can even change depending on the season or project. I am currently leading a team of 18 from our church to go to Uganda to help plant a church in order to reach and help the rebuilding in the northern part of that country. I am GOING this time. I am also MOBILIZING people to go and participate with us. But we need SENDERS, supporters, intercessors, logisticians, planners, resource-givers to help the work fulfill its God-ordained purpose. God has and will continue to provide all that is necessary to get the job done. But the joy for us is to be a part of His work, whether we go or stay.
2. Highlight Detailing in Your Dress The length and material of the veil can be used to highlight certain parts of the wedding dress. The eye is drawn to the point where the veil ends. For example, a short shoulder length veil is ideal for accenting an elaborate neckline. If a dress has lace or detailed embroidery, a plain sheer veil may show the dress at its best advantage.
Growing as the understory in the forest,
Lindsay Beckett longed to be reunited with her first love, Quinn Montgomery, until she learns the secret that sent him fleeing from her in the first place. He’s an alien, a Hemera, and she’s half-Hemera herself. As if that wasn’t enough to ruin her dreams of a perfect life, when their child is born, they discover she fulfills a prophesy told twenty light years away and many years ago. Lindsay wants to ignore it, until her husband is murdered and suddenly believing becomes a matter of survival.
2. Relief work
Huffman worked as a teacher’s aide at the Southmoore High School, near Oklahoma City, Oklahoma.
“Look, big guy,” Lanigan remained conciliatory, “you’re right. We are in need. I don’t know of anyone who isn’t. But, we’re in better shape than a lot of the folks out there.”
I want them to…
January 7, 2010 Clip No. 2350
i hope your weekend is full of goods!
Katrina Kaif
skiing
Being pale, spice-free, Swedish-Irish types, my siblings and I recoiled at the chili’s red pepper and obscene beanery. It looked like roadkill, and the flavor was about the same. The spaghetti squash was equally (and possibly actively) malevolent, possibly because we were tricked by the name into believing it would be real spaghetti. Alas, it was not. And as food was not wasted in our household, Pa made each of us sit at the dinner table until our plates were licked clean. Three hours later, I hadn’t eaten a bite, so I was sent to bed sans dinner.
I never laughed once and, as far as I could see, the only humour in the film came when Kate Winslet unexpectedly vomited on a coffee table. There was a knee-jerk laugh. But, if you have to rely on an unexpected vomit for your laughs, you are in big trouble.
4 Tb rice flour (you can use regular flour) and water until you reach a pipeable consistency.
Let's try to think this way as we work through our adoptions. Do you need some new clothes for your kiddos? Consider an adoption t-shirt! So many people are selling those. Do you need a kitchen gadget? Find a fundraiser! Want to own a Kindle, a Nook, an Ipad? Enter a giveaway! Looking for inexpensive gift items, or new makeup? I'm selling Avon, and I'll bet others are too. We are taught to think globally but act locally. Let's think that way too. I know for me, I may have paid a few extra dollars for those kitchen items, but I'm so glad I did :)
Working on my latest book called “Neural Thinking for Enhanced Creativity Volumes 1 and 2″, I thought it would be better to provide the artifacts of the writing process on the cloud. Therefore, in using EndNote, Mind Genius, and Word together let your imagination soar at the possibilities for book and article construction.
In reality is it possible to send someone else?
With private school over for the season, I assume Michelle and the girls have tagged along for this educational junket too, accompanied by a dozen of the girls’ best friends.
The flower is a digital image from the Doodle Daisy kit. I printed off a bunch of the design on different shades of pink cardstock, cut them out and layered them to create a big bloom. I also used a couple of the petals to make the leaves.
Percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty is a nonsurgical procedure in which a catheter tipped with a balloon is threaded from a blood vessel in the thigh into the blocked artery.
Watching? I have been watching 'Vera' a crime on ITV drama starring Brenda Blethyn (I think of Vera as the UK female equivalent of Columbo), there's some fabulous story lines in this series and the acting is great. The country scenery is amazing last nights show featured lots of stunning moorland shots. I really like Brenda Blethyn and she does comedy as well as she does serious drama, as anyone who has ever watched the film 'Saving Grace' will know.
This morning I received the following email which I’ll post in its entirely below. Any suggestions for Kevin? I can only recommend checking out Planeta’s Volunteer Wiki.
When it was close to 11 PM, we were still overstaffed, in part due to the transfers with which I helped, so I floated to a medical ICU upstairs. Though we're all ICUs, the ones upstairs from my cardiovascular surgical recovery unit are arranged differently both physically and in terms of workflow. They use some computer charting that we don't, supplies are stored in different places, medications available on the unit are slightly different, etc. Thankfully, the med ICU staff observed both common sense and policy in giving me a fairly simple pair of patients. When floating to such a different environment, this is the way it's supposed to happen. Just as we would never assign a fresh surgical patient to a float to our unit, they're not supposed to assign us just-admitted patients or unstable ones because we aren't familiar with the lay of the land.
Come with fasting, weeping, and mourning. Don’t tear your clothing in your grief, but tear your hearts instead.” Return to the Lord your God, for he is merciful and compassionate, slow to get angry and filled with unfailing love. He is eager to relent and not punish.
This story is one of grace and strength and I was inspired reading it and at the same time feel a sense of urgency that more should be done to raise awareness and to conquer this disease that threaten the lives of many otherwise healthy individuals.
NASA Says Global Temperatures Rising
For those readers that are unaware, Pam Rogers was a author of the infamous Louisville, KY, animal control ordinance. The very ordinance that the Louisville Kennel Club (and various other individuals) filed a federal lawsuit against, and were successful in several key areas. For the complete ruling issued by Judge Charles R. Simpson (U.S. District Court), please click here.
My analysts have recently completed a research report called Single Best Leveraged Play for the Gold Bull Market. We have hundreds of hours invested in researching, compiling and writing this report. My company plans to sell this report for $95. You can get it for free.
from a distance
my heart singing
and often out in the middle of nowhere,
Why is it that when I see you, laughter comes out first?
When lying in wait, only the tip of the tail moves. Cats are good judges of distance, leaping to attack when they know they can reach the prey in two or three bounds. They rarely miss their target, of course.
You can see the complete diagram with a link to the PDF at Diagram of what happened. There is also a graphic that shows how leaking oil well might be plugged by the ‘top kill’ method. This has only been done on land before, not under the pressures at 1 mile deep.
Jules – News Editor
Anyway that's what I've been up to -- living the life called family that always takes precedence over anything. I'll be getting back to work now and begin stopping by to visit old friends and new. I have promised myself I will complete the A to Z list before August this year :-)
This week's forum topic was inspired by a couple of recent comments here at The Ape about advertising, attention, and literary writing.
There is also a set of play-by-post tabletop RPG games that distract me, and between them, the healthy posts from the players, and the rest of life short stint gaming is still working. So for now a quick 15 to 30 minute session will do, with much gnashing, power-ups, and gear to be swindled from the nefarious foes.
So that ended two good training weeks. After the 18-miler, I officially started taper. My long run for this week will be the Whidbey Half.
My mom died on May 3, 2012, and with the support of my family, I attended the Storymakers writers conference anyway. It was two days of blissful fog with wonderful friends and an awesome roommate. I was completely distracted and I now realize what a blessing that was, because reality came crashing back down quickly enough.
I don't think there's any reason to ever respond to a rejection letter, and some agents will even tell you not to, ever, for any reason. That being said, for me personally, it never hurts to hear a polite "thank you" now and then. Most agents use form rejections of some sort or another, and for that reason I see no reason to send a response. In fact, one of the reasons form rejections are used is to help prevent responses to every email we receive.
A new washer and dryer and a brand new car - what's next for Country Wife? Will she stay the country bumpkin we know and love (or not, but still: nya nya nya!), or will she get all citified with her fancy gadgets, wotnots, and doohickeys?
Given was one of the first booths i encountered when i walked in to the show. The colors and Layout of the booth immediately drew me in(Red and Black are my favorite color combination). So i ventured over to see what this company was all about. Needless to say i was pleasantly surprised. It is a wonderful blend of Tequila and Lime Juice. So its a liqueur used for mixing but also can be enjoyed alone. Here's a little background on Given.....
redo shelves in vintage kitchen cabinet
Your remaining 25 note cards and a complete Works Consulted list (minimum: 7 sources) are due on Thursday.
The slight teeter
I don’t have to ask what you’re thinking cause the same thing is on my mind.
~ Nice to Meet You ~
Nearly 1,000 officers from 17 federal, state and local agencies worked together in today’s surprise sweep early this morning. Preliminary results from Operation Disarm indicate that 80 parolees were arrested, 50 weapons, over 150 rounds of ammunition and drugs, including marijuana and cocaine, and drug paraphernalia were confiscated, as well as 11 children were taken into protective custody. The goal of the operation was to focus on parolees with felony convictions for weapons possessions and parolees with gang affiliations, and return any violators back to custody.
Police Inspector – Senior operational officer 24/7. Oversees all officers on duty at that time – there is usually just one “duty inspector” in operational command at any time.
We left in relief, and after yet another shake up drove straight home. What a day full of joy, sadness, excitement,fear and pretty much every emotion you can think of.
So to start your Snitches you will need:
Kasem
If diversity isn’t forced, why is there affirmative action & racial employment quotas?
Students in J457, Advanced Editing, are writing guest posts for this blog this semester. This is the sixth of those posts. Shannon Coffey is a junior journalism major with a focus in editing and graphic design. She enjoys going on kitchen adventures that sometimes turn into catastrophes, trying to keep up with her Twitter timeline and daydreaming about the future, when she will design textbooks for ESL students.
AILA's choice for the Best Young Adult Book is Lurline Wailana McGregor's Between the Deep Blue Sea and Me: A Novel, published by Kamehameha Publishing, 2008.
Obviously, this was written before his present trip to Jerusalem. He knew of the great dangers that faced him. He knew of severe satanic opposition. He knew that he was wrestling against spiritual wickedness in heavenly places. He knew that he would have to be spiritually fortified. “Strive together with me in your prayers to God for me.”
From Genesis to Revelation, each book of the Bible has its key details laid out for you clearly and engagingly in a colorful two-page spread that includes
I love him dearly and want so desperately to give him a forever home to thrive and be cherished in.
wrapping herself in a mummy towel
6. I watched Bethenny Ever After - Bethenny and Ellen together made me smile.
So, have you decided yet?? Am I a coo-coo crazy person!? Does it look so home-done and lame that you want to stop following my blog?? OR, if I told you I got it at Urban Outfitters on Clearance, would you think it was a MAJOR score??!!
Congress
I was able to get home in time to have a nap, then I cleaned and tidied the house in preparation for my birthday party that night (I admit I did a half-assed job of it and kept the lighting low). The party was awesome, and I got lots of cards, gifts and hugs from my dear, dear friends. The evening ended at 4am, after the last 8 stragglers ordered pizza.
From a hemlock tree
Stickles
All of that is really just a build up for no Bobby Flay today. However, I was looking through my food porn, and forgot about all the awesome things I tested for Vegan Pie in the Sky! Yay! I seriously heart Isa and Terry. They are, indeed, the best. I got to meet them in person at VVC and they were cooler than cool. Enough glowing...onto PIE!
In a Washington Post article on the subject, Ellen Miller, executive director at Sunlight Foundation, a nonprofit group focusing on the use of technology for greater government transparency, said the effort represents “a sea change in the government’s attitude,” with newfound support of the idea that government data belongs in the hands of citizens instead of locked away in the basement of a federal agency.
Can - Future Days - 1973
--Maimonides Medical Center
Thank you to all that entered! We will be posting a giveaway each month so check back often for another chance to win some awesome prizes!
i love you friends.
Larger organisations, with bigger workloads typically, have a multi-sourcing strategy. While this has merit, multi-sourcing does add significantly to the complexity. These complexities may arise simply from challenges of managing multiple vendor relationships, but often from the need for risk mitigation required as vendor responsibilities and scope boundaries overlap, and mind you scopes boundaries always overlap, however minimally.
While in the past only extremely qualified professionals and blue collar workers in sectors shunned by Singaporeans are allowed into Singapore, we are now seeing an increasing number of semi-skilled foreigners on S-passes and these are the group of foreigners who are competing with locals for jobs and depressing their wages in the process.
I smiled about it the whole way home.
Meaning: This color is a symbol of EDS, childhood depression, missing children, open records for adoptees, environmental concerns, kidney cancer, tissue/organ donation, homeopathy, Lyme Disease, and worker and driving safety.
But it’s not just the individual who is attracted to this dream of on-demand wish fulfillment. For quite different reasons, corporations love positive thinking.
Next, we sing or say a response to a prayer from the book of Psalms which is also from the Old Testament. Then the Lector reads the second reading. The second reading is from the New Testament which is about Jesus.
THE CHEESECAKE FACTORY LOUISIANA CHICKEN PASTA
Moist and chewy, with a kick from the ginger and crunch from the sugar granules sprinkled on top, it hit the sweet spot as good as any traditional cookie could.
Why you should hire a professional to do the carpet steam cleaning?
Put your butt in the seat
It just shows you how much paruresis consumes us. Even someone such as myself, who is by all accounts (ok, maybe just my own account) someone who has experienced great success in recovery. This notion just strengthens my theory that all paruretics are lifers. Even if you do recover and get to a point where urination is a non-issue, you will always be plagued by negative thoughts. No matter how small or infrequent those thoughts might be, it is simply impossible to completely and fully exert them from your mind, whether conscious or unconscious.
“That is nutty, of course,” he adds. And he’s right. But I would argue that there is another reason to put those commas in that sentence. The point is that Atwater expressed regret before he died. What he died of and when he died of it are both details that the author provides only as an aside, to satisfy the reader’s curiosity. Cause and date of death are not essential to the meaning of the sentence. In fact, I might have been tempted to bury the obituary in parentheses, like a whisper: “Before Atwater died (of brain cancer, in 1991), he expressed regret …”
Baby I am Dying Now, I don’t know why you’re smiling
Unbearable crosses
And I can only stand,
Just as primary instruction makes the teacher possible, so he renders himself dispensable through schooling at the secondary level. The university teacher is thus no longer a teacher and the student is no longer a pupil. Instead the student conducts research on his own behalf and the professor supervises his research and supports him in it.
When I pulled off the highway, I tore around the corner on two wheels and I noticed Squirrely was still there, in tact! I doubt the Other Moms were driving around Squirrely to admire him but more worried about getting fur in their tires. Either way, thank you Other Moms!!
or a foreign blockage in her nose causing the cough, the bloody discharge.
Paris was my favorite city of our Euro trip. There's so much to see, so much to do, I need go back and eat more Berthillon. So if you're heading to Paris and looking for an ice cream guide, do send a plane ticket my way, because declining your offer would just be plain rude.
In these situations people LOVE to quote the Bible at you, when pointing out that it must be your lack of faith that is leading to this calamity. And indeed it is true, in the life of Jesus we often find him talking about the importance of faith when having to do with miracles. Countless examples can be given of the faith He talked about while healing, exorcising, moving mountains…Matthew 17:20 being only one…
Brian T: What is your Zombie Apocalypse Plan?
Comparatively, Indigo CS delivers reduced fuel productivity than the Dzire. It yields about 11 kmpl all around city and about 17 kmpl about highways. It’s great when it comes to Indian motors but slightly below what that offered by Dzire.
It was the Battle (or series of battles) of Khalkhin Gol, on the borders of Mongolia and Japanese occupied Manchuka (Manchuria). In May 1939, a border dispute between two small units of Mongolians and Japanese puppets, the Manchukans erupted into a major border war. While small by World War 2 standards, it was bigger than most wars.
I like their cause. I believe strongly believe in justice and freedom. But it’s hard to keep that going when the guy their going after has been missing for a couple of years.
I have my favorite saints that I look to for ways of overcoming my faults and weaknesses. As I have noted before, #Catholic traditions allows us to look to the saints to pray for us not unlike sitting in a cemetery talking to you deceased relative.
My perfect content is the amber of sunset
Twins! I spotted the first one set up and loaded with dishes; the price tag was for the pair. What pair? After a quick look around, I found her sister folded up and all ready to come home with me. I'm convinced they were such a bargain because the dealer thought a little rust was a bad thing. I would have bought the entire family if they were available, but I'm happy to have these two cuties.
...he loves to explore by himself... away from mama.
Add a handful of chopped basil and oregano, seasoning, a drizzle of balsamic vingar and some crushed garlic.
But that's the way it went and then I became a mom, the kind who swore she'd do it differently and then failed. Okay I don't chase my kids with a belt. But I do lose it. And I apologize. Because I know better. The kids are just being kids, acting age-appropriately and so forth, and I know how they feel because I was once in their shoes.
This morning I woke up to a strange weather phenomenon: hovering over my street was a giant dark gray storm cloud, like the space ship in Armageddon. Beyond it, looking toward the library, a bright blue sky with puffy, cheerful white cumulus clouds.
Tuesday, 10 April: Dave Foxon (43), manager of the Umbhaba Lodge near Hazyview, was shot dead in front of his pregnant wife and two children.
Having access to a range of useful and current cybersafety resources is vital in ensuring users have safe and positive experiences online. To assist in this ongoing work, a survey has been jointly created by ALIA and the ACMA to gather information.
He was talking to his other World Vision friend and, since I pretty much constrasted against everyone because of my hair, makeup and outfit - nevermind my massive Friis&Company bag, he easily spotted me too. So I was like ....*siiiiiiiiiiiiiiigh* and waved him over. He was all "What's up? Are you okay?"
If this truly is Lance Armstrong’s last Tour, I hope he’s able to stay and fight it out with the rest of his teammates and to finish with his dignity intact.
Almost as soon as I turned on the CD, I knew this was a mistake. It was as if Evil itself had reached through the window and forced me to do it.
Now Ronnie comes in firing with punches and kicks. Ronnie is definitely fighting with a sense of urgency, and he goes in and picks him up again – then slams him Matt Hughes Style.
Add the potato cut in big pieces. Add 2 C water and salt and pepper to pepper. Cook for about 15 to 20 minutes, until all vegetables are soft.
In a perfect world we may not need Remploy; unfortunately, we do not live in a perfect world or are ever likely to. So until utopia is reached, there are those members of society for whom Remploy will be the safest, most suitable and preferable option for employment.
The mothers claim is clearly ridiculous. The difficulty though is, that in this day and age, nothing is too stupid to be considered a reasonable case in a court.
The Supreme Constitutional Court
we were both exhausted and trembling with fatigue.
Recent studies have shown that after interaction with their pets, individuals have higher levels of Oxytocin in their bloodstream than if they have not had such an interaction with their pet. This research moves science toward finding measurable effects of human-animal interaction.
He doesn't play for the respect
Available on iTunes, Amazon, Napster, Rhapsody and more.
This is the first of (hopefully) many events of this kind.
So this is what it has come to in the U.S. Wasting taxpayer dollars to promote Islam while simultaneously taking away the rights of non-Muslims at breakneck speed. Who is this country has the courage to defend our liberties? Clearly the DOJ, US Attorney’s office, FBI, nor a corrupt Congress have any plans to do so.
Me: So what?
Yesterday afternoon I received an e mail.
Wow, where has the time gone? Let me vent a little in a nonsensical way for a bit. Sorry, but sometimes blogging is more about ME getting it out of my head in typed words (not necessarily for someone to read). Otherwise thoughts are moving in and out of my head at light speed. Having to type a sentence at least forces me to focus on one thought. My motivation and time for all things ME seems to be gone. Job cuts at work (that I survived but will take on tons new work) Moms Alzheimers, Mr. Garden Muscle working tons and tons of overtime and doing a fundraiser/auction . . . life just seems to be taking me by the horns instead of the other way around... and kicking me while I'm down!!
The Adjustment Bureau - 2011
No, my life isn’t in perfect shape, but I’m working on it. And that’s what really matters. Whether you label it assholery, evolutionary retardation or simply the human condition is extraneous. What matters is what you’re trying to do about it.
Today the universe reminded me to heal. To listen and receive the signs it is sending. I spent last week in a heavy fog of judgement, the energy I was raised in. Today, while listening to Rikka Zimmerman, I am reminded that this heavy energy is not mine. That it is within my power to dissipate it for myself, and in the process, there is the hope that I will also dissipate it in others. As a parent I am reminded that to judge your children is to suffocate their individual power and truth. Their divine lights. When I was a child I knew from the time of memory, that I was incarnated in this life to write beauty, to participate in the healing of the earth and humanity and to raise a family structured on love. It’s taken me many years to begin to step into my power. Judgement is a limiting force. When someone judges you, they judge themselves. It’s a ripple effect of destruction.
There’s promise of long evenings of sunlight, of waking up with the sun streaming in my windows, of lazy weekends and the comfort of warmth. There’s hope.
Here's what I finally did for the frosting...
Policy makers signaled this month they plan to reduce the benchmark interest rate to 9 percent this year, a quarter of a point above its record low, after economic growth in the world’s sixth biggest economy slowed to 2.7 percent last year from 7.5 percent in 2010.
“I did it! At last, I did it!” Nearly leaping through the air, Hilda whirled back into her home, eager to watch how it went. Gleefully, she touched her crystal awake, and asked to see Cinderella. Please. The night had gone so well already, Hilda hardly dared hope for more, but if only-if only…Please let her enchant the prince. Please let her become important! It was the only way this girl could possibly win her Fairy Godmother license.
Cast : Nathaniel Kiwi, Laura Hesse, Peter Roberts, Scott Brennan, Steven Stagg, Hollie Kennedy, Michael Russo, Maree Kelly, Chris Gay, Roz Hammond
Hey all, well, I'm still here and baby boy is still cooking and appears to have no intention of going anywhere in the outside world fast!!! I am officially 38 weeks today and will see my dr. again tomorrow morning. I thought I had some contractions on Sunday but haven't felt anything since. I was actually in the pool and was somewhat bored so I started doing some squats and once I got out started having some cramping but once I laid down, they left me.. sooo... here I sit.. just waiting.
My sunny spot consists of gravel paths leading through slightly raised beds, a blooming haven of bumble bees, hummingbirds and usually a napping kitty or two. It is a place that feels like home to me. I built its borders with river rocks, handpicked out of a big pile, leveled edge to edge, to create a meandering free form outline on the very back of my new home’s lot. I turned the hard clay soil within these river rocks, then hand-screened, shovel-full by shovel-full, new soil to fill them up. Then I turned the dirt again.
HB 1335 establishes the state funding as required by Amendment 23. Modest increases in state revenues have made it possible to give K-12 $57 million for 2012-13. This amount will simply maintain the average per-student spending at the same level as it is now.
No government can survive indefinitely while catering to the fantasy that taxes are evil or unnecessary.
Onion / Bottom part of the spring onion - 1/4 cup, finely chopped
plastic items do. (Links to hubs about baking uses for silicone are at the
Social satire is a tough category for queries because the book is not plot driven. You've added to your challenge by placing this in a fictive world. You might want to think about leaving out the proper names here and just have Chase on a tour, finding a stamp, etc. Without the proper names we can focus on the gist of the story. (although Stamphenge IS hilarious)
Had I waited for those shitheads to do the right thing and take care of me, I'd still be limping around on my right knee. And for those of you keeping track, I injured the knee in January 2011. It's now May 2012. And they'd have been perfectly content to let me continue to live with the torn knee until someone forced them to take care of it.
Matthew 2:11
BREAKFAST SHOW (RADIO 1)
5 kind
I witnessed something yesterday that I never in a million BILLION years thought I would ever see in Paris, ESPECIALLY in the very serene, very upscale and very calm Jardin du Luxembourg.
The CIA chief was seen in the lift, on his way to see Bin Laden, and later, it is alleged, boasted to friends about his contact. He was recalled to Washington soon afterwards.
Port Brewing High Tide Fresh Hop IPA
colors come and go, but I think today's
Dear Sparklers,
Cost: $6 per person
ORIGINAL NOTES:
1.)Cardmadfairy's :
So, there’s some food for thought. Makes you think twice about sneaking up on me in the library, huh? I might sing at you. Eek.
Okay, let’s leave it there for now. In part two, we’ll look at the arguments on the other side of the debate.
The Latin Jazz Quintet for Tru-Sound from 1962.
In all fairness, I feel I should tell you that they told me that they are "...committed to ensuring that cocoa is grown responsibly." They went on to list programs in which they participate or fund, which strive toward this goal. And they referred me to their site: http://www.thehersheycompany.com/social-responsibility/sustainability/
EDUCATE AND INFORM THE MASS OF THE PEOPLE. ENABLE THEM TO SEE THAT IT IS THEIR INTEREST TO PRESERVE PEACE AND ORDER, AND THEY WILL PRESERVE THEM. ENLIGHTEN THE PEOPLE GENERALLY, AND TYRANNY AND OPPRESSION OF THE BODY AND MIND WILL VANISH LIKE EVIL SPIRITS AT THE DAWN OF DAY.
After soaking sunflower seeds, drain and rinse them, and add all ingredients together in a food processor or blender and blend into a smooth paste. Will keep in refrigerator for 1 week.
fun: first to start off the day twirling with a tyke. spinning moving jiving smiling, getting dizzy, 1 2 3 4 times around, switch directions, spinning around, singing to the music, laughter.
I had a few sweaty moments over the course of changing out all of the knobs in our house. And one of my BFFs may or may not have locked herself in the bathroom when this happened. Not just the bathroom – her little bitty potty closet. We (I?) laugh about it now, but she says it was so scary to be stuck in there, with no way out. (She busted the knob to get herself out.)
One Muhammad Ali Plaza
Black beauty is so peaceful
3. Polka Dots & Moonbeams
Living by the sea. I moved to this village two years ago and you cannot help but be touched and inspired by such a close and mysterious and ever changing neighbour. I was also shocked by the rubbish brought in on the tide – as well as a few treasures. My main key was the mast of a sunken ship. For a long time I didn’t know what it was but at low tide I would see this black stick appear – then I was told it was the mast of a sunken ship. That fired my imagination – thinking what else is unseen, or part seen. And also the curious kind heads of the seals – these creatures that can breathe on land and under water. Before writing the story I drew the images that were in my head – then I told the story to a friend.
See? ;) Love this bracelet- the pic? Not so much, but hey.
I'm really glad with these polishes (and my boyfriend!) and can't wait to try them all!
Anywa, Joel was right and it is good to have such a friend. But believe me, the guy argues with me about whether he is arguing or I am, and I wasn't even arguing. Ever have someone ranting and raving then tell you to chill out? Crazy friggin nut. But right is right, and what can you say about that?
Drink no longer water, but use a little wine for thy stomach’s sake and thine often infirmities.
And the Winner of Bling from last week's Featured Artist comments is...........
2. Spotting opportunities: RB – “If something is a good idea, consider it, then work out how to make it happen.”
Russian spittle-licking suits them just fine, and hey, Ivan, why don't you buy some of our lovely smack while you're here?
Let’s start with my unruly spirit. I am genetically wired, and expected to in my home, to have an opinion. I will voice it, sometimes nicely and sometimes not so nicely. I am stubborn, proud, loud and passionate and I don’t coddle men. For that matter, I don’t coddle women either. I make no apologies for the choices I have made or for my past that has led me to be here, right now. I am incredibly vocal: whether it’s about a band I love or good sex. You will know my opinion if you ask me. Rarely, will I offer it unless I’m making a statement to start a conversation. Many times, I say something rather controversial just to piss people off. I just get a kick out of it, but I try, rather successfully, in changing the subject when the moment is getting too intense.
You–
4 oz. bittersweet or semi-sweet chocolate
Now open the serial monitor box, sit back and wait a moment or two, and you should be presented with something very similar to this:
"Ummm~ I'm just telling you~ Um, Grammie, Rosie Bumps and Bruises, my LaLa Loopsie doll, she's gonna have a sleep over with you at your house tomorrow~ So I have a list for her, and I hope everything's gonna be fine~ She's never had a sleep over before, but it might be pretty fine~
Happy is the one who understands what he or she has been designed to be and do, and walks in that purpose.
I know that we are a little behind the times with this movie but it had two advantages. The theater was near empty. Aside from the incredibly rude people behind us that kept kicking her chair until she turned around and gave a nice version of her death stare, there were only two or three other couples in there with us. In addition to that, we grabbed a matinée showing which made it only $7 each as opposed to the normal $9. In the end we saved a whopping six bucks! Which doesn’t seem like a lot but it paid for our popcorn so… That was awesome.
you'll need;
Yeah, oxygen deprivation makes your brain do some weird things.
It's been a long time coming, but here, finally, is my collection of the best tracks from Christmas in July 2010. I shared a whole lot of stuff out that year, and here are the very best of all those songs. If you don't find something in here that you like, well, you aren't trying very hard. What's in here? Let's have a look...
He went.
An ideal food for face. It not only nourishes the skin but also magically removes scar, skin blemish and acne. Apply over the blemish area of skin or face and leave it on for 10 minutes. Wash off and your skin or face come out sparkling clean and nourished
It’s been another rough week, and I cannot believe it’s weekend already. I’m definitely in no mood for any serious stuff, so here’s a naughty joke I’d like to share with the world:
"Do You Read Me" – 5:20
Now, I know I’ve put a lot out there – but there is much that needs to be done. After all, realizing one’s potential takes a lot of work. It may not be the only blueprint to success, but areas that I believe we can do much better in. Besides, when it comes to our elite athletes it seems to me, looking from the outside in, that we are near ground zero right now. So, on the positive side, we can make it what we want it to be.
Add brown sugar, tomato paste, vinegar, mustard, soy sauce, bay
In primary at church, they usually 'spotlight' a child. The kid gets a blurp read about them- and they get to stand proud for all their friends to see. They also get a little 'prize'.... As you can see, it's a really big deal.
Misery is replaced with freedom.
Sam’s Club has your favorite back to school items from computers to clothing, and at the best values.
Then, when you finished your business, you would take the sponge-stick, rinse it in the channel of running water at your feet, and without getting up or revealing anything, you would PUSH THE STICK THROUGH THE HOLE AT THE FRONT AND WIPE YOUR BOTTOM. That's what those holes at the front are for. And that's why the handle of the sponge-stick is so long. After a good wipe, you would rinse it again, stand up and leave it in the basin for THE NEXT PERSON TO USE. (Kids, don't try this at home.)
But the question only seemed to spur Kelly on and she quickly pulled out a lead of a metre or more.
New Years. The Hubs played a gig in Arkansas, outside, in 20-degree weather. I, very smartly, chose to stay home and watched the fireworks at midnight from my bedroom window.
“When we were younger we would hear more roots and culture music, and we never heard a lot of explicit music like today; So our influences come from those roots reggae tunes and musical versions that actually had meaning to everyday people’s lives and the things affecting them a that time.” RoxiRock says.
Cautious with Commitments
Gain Understanding
Tips for Writing Your Family's Dreams
“none of us is as smart as all of us” - Ken Blanchard
I told him, and we went. We ate the best Thai food ever that evening, and the next day (after his Bolton meeting, and my breakfast) explored the town. I want to move there. Before I run out of time (just over a minute to go) I'll find a photo.
4. I am the eldest of four children, having three younger brothers.
Mile 5-7: Oh shit oh shit oh shit oh shit. I think I might die.
In the meantime I am just filing inspirational ideas away for the future in my head, & also on pinterest (of course). So I thought I'd share some pretty things on my mind as of late...
While the cookies are baking, go ahead and make the filling. Using a stand mixer or handheld mixer, whisk together the sugar and cream (or water) until nice and fluffy. You want the filling to be thick enough that it doesn't ooze out the sides of the cookies after they are filled, so if you need to add more powdered sugar, do so in small increments. If you need to thin out your filling, add more half and half a few drops at a time. Whisk in the peppermint extract a bit at a time, and taste as you go, the peppermint flavor shouldn't be overwhelming.
There are so many aspects of planning a party. I like to make lists to start out: guests, food, decorations, activities, music/movies/entertainment, invitations, and favors. I always, always, always have a theme - that's what makes the planning fun - and write down any and all ideas that go with that theme. Often I list, narrow down, finalize, and throw out multiple themes before actually choosing one and running with it. I've thought up a 70's-themed party and a spa day that never came to be. But I've also planned a successful board-game themed party for my little brother and a fun Alice In Wonderland Sweet Sixteen Unbirthday for myself.
For example, if you have a particularly high royalty, the discount, relative to the RRP will be larger, and conversley (sic), if you opt for a particularly low royalty, the discount, relative to the RRP will be smaller.
Anthony Davis turns his head sharply in my direction. I can see his dark blue eyes. They are shimmering even in the dark cell room. He turns the rest of his body towards the chair that sits alone in front of me. I hold my breath as he takes the first few steps to the chair.
The film does have some redeeming features such as the good visuals up for display which do look very good when looking over the landscapes or cities (not bad for Blu-ray test). The sword fights were fun to watch but not very clever, would be a fun watch around the holidays with the family and not for anyone looking for drama or intelligence because you will not get it.
But just to make sure that I keep things on an even keel, here is a clip that I just KNOW that I haven't posted before. Not until now.
I think the idea is a good example of what 'lawmakers' do to try and make themselves look useful when they don't want to tackle bigger problems. Like when you're supposed to be studying for an exam and you find any menial task to avoid it... perhaps by writing a blog post on something that you wouldn't normally care about...
If there is any “cure” for children or youth with gender identity issues, it can be found within the keywords acceptance, androgyny, compromise and communication.. It is important for parents to recognize that children need to be accepted for who they are, not for what others perceive they should be. This is also true for children with gender identity issues. There is a variety of gender specialized material which indicates that having a transgender identity or crossdressing needs is not mentally disordered, mentally diseased or abnormal. Once that fact is recognized, it is easy to understand that the majority of difficulties transgender persons face do not originate internally or from their own question-asking process. Rather, the origin of their difficulties is external, resulting from the abuse, harassment and violence transgender persons face from people who cannot accept differences in others.. Parents can play a major role in teaching children how to communicate effectively and counteract abuse from others who cannot accept differences.
Have you ever participated in a writing sprint? If so, what did you think?
"Oh yah?"
-Guacamelee: So this is a pretty solid action/platformer that did not light my world on fire but also was just … happy. It was a happy time with a friend in co-op. Everything is designed so that whichever of you sucks never holds the good one back, you just sort of pop happily along suplexing skeletons and shifting dimensions. Playing around with switching between fire and water in the Temple of Fire/Water was pretty cute. Also! You can turn into a chicken if you want. And it’s even surprisingly funny.
The trail crosses the creek several places, but the last log bridge across the creek presented us with an obstacle. The narrow log was still in place, but part of the rails had gotten pushed over (high water? falling tree?), and the bridge was a good 10 feet or so above a deep and quick part of the creek with no obvious places to ford in sight.
And the mysterious dudes who break into the shop? Well, they're all middle-aged white guys in black, wearing dark glasses, yeah?
I sit and write this as you live out your day… You don’t realise that I am drawing you to me…
David Van Buskirk has pleaded guilty to assault.David Van Buskirk has pleaded guilty to assault. (CBC News)
We are insanely mad for anything monochrome, as we believe they match whatever outfits or occasions we attend.
A common currency is not necessary for peace and liberty. Europe — first and foremost the currency union — urgently needs to be reformed. Thoroughly. That is the only way to halt the destructive downward spiral. That is another sad truth, the actual result of contemporary policy: we, Germany, Europe, the entire proud West are in a historic decline. Frantically clinging to your vision of Europe is accelerating this decline. And the introduction of the transfer union is putting the final seal on it. How is a continent — a system — supposed to be successful when it rewards production with taxes and mismanagement with astronomic transfer payments?
Lover Mine by J.R. Ward
Collection B's 2012 Spring line has some adorable raincoats, this alligator print being one of them! It's really light so you can just toss it over whatever you're already wearing and keep completely dry.
Here's a little sledding video, (I discovered iMovie), so you can share the thrill of Gravity!
We arrive on Long Street and head straight to the Womens Trading Post where Brittany had bought her painting the day before. Becca and Emily each fall in love with paintings as I explore the other offerings, finding nothing. Unfortunately the man who we had met the day before wasnt there and the woman couldnt seem to locate him via cell phone. (They seem to bargain through cell phones by calling their bosses). Disappointed the four of us go to leave the huge indoor market when we happen to bump into the owner and his brother, the painter himself. Ecstatic, we run back to the stall and the bargaining hits over drive. The three of them end up with large paintings as my mind wanders back to a necklace that I had held off of the day before, a three strand freshwater pearl necklace that I had put off incase I found something better (it was only 10 USD). We quickly head down the street towards Green Market Square, me with the idea of the necklace, Becca hoping for some more earrings and Brittany and Emily with paintings on their minds. When we arrive, we notice many stalls gone and many more packing up. We split up (its safe there-there are a TON of police), Becca coming with me (since she was wearing a different version of the necklace and could point to it to help me locate the stall) and Emily and Brittany heading off to find their loot.
Meaning: This color is a symbol of pancreatic cancer, testicular cancer, thyroid cancer, domestic violence, ADD, alzheimer’s, religious tolerance, animal abuse, the victims of 9/11 including the police and firefighters, Crohn’s disease and colitis, cystic fibrosis, lupus, leimyosarcoma, and fibromyalgia.
Usually I'm on vacation when I can't recall the day of the week but somehow, despite the fact that I'm NOT sitting by a pool in the shade of a palm tree or sipping a frozen fruity cocktail, it's happened again. Yes, it's Tuesday which means I skipped over Monday and have some catching up to do. Here goes:
Synopsis (from Goodreads): In a future world, Vampires reign. Humans are blood cattle. And one girl will search for the key to save humanity.
I’ve written about my androgynous doctor before. I’ll lead with ‘she’ in the she/he because I’m 87% sure she/he is a ‘she.’ I don’t want to put her name here, but it is indeed one like ‘Pat,’ immortalized on Saturday Night Live ages ago – a name that works for both women and men. There is that sizable element of doubt that no matter how much I stare and look for signs of say, boobies or balls, it just isn’t possible to tell with the naked eye. She/he is a large person. Bigger than me which puts her/him at about 6’-3” and a little chunky making it impossible to tell if she/he has small woman boobs or big man-boobs. She/he has spiked short hair and wears male dress shirts with cheap jeans. She/he wears earrings and wire-framed glasses. She/he has a deep female voice or a feminine sounding male voice.
Then he asked my where I was planning on going for vacation this year. I told him Amsterdam, Belgium, Germany, and Copenhagen. "Are you going to Oktoberfest" he asked excitedly. I told him no, not this year. "It starts on the 18th right?" Honestly, I didn't know for sure, but my Doctor did. Isn't that awesome!
I've been wanting to use this gorgeous Ching Chou Kuik design for a while and I wanted to make a richly-coloured, detailed, Eastern-influenced card. My starting point for this card, other than the image, was digging out my scrummy Taj Mahal paper stack and choosing the gorgeous, glittered, patterned background paper. I coloured the image to coordinate with the paper, using my Promarkers, metallic Promarkers and also some Cosmic Shimmer Acrylic Drawing Inks for added shimmer.
The trees, the air, the slow pace of life, the sheer healthiness of the place – people have a longer lifespan here than anywhere else in Canada.
The commission recommends that euthanasia deaths be reported, after the death, to monitor and evaluate whether the law is being abused. But the reporting procedure does not protect people. If (and when) a report is analyzed, and if an abuse has occurred, the person is already dead; so no effective redress is possible.
Large Serving Bowl
Because there was a fatal flaw: we couldn’t make calls in our own house.
Pop and then float away.
My aunt passed away two days ago. She died in the early morning, in an emergency room, holding my mother’s hand. -How my mother escapes that memory is beyond my comprehension, but I digress. – My Aunt was the type of person, during her prime and before she fell ill, that always took care of everyone. She was never married. Never had children of her own. But she raised three generations of children.
I have been seeing a lot written in the cooking world about the combination of blackberries and thyme. One recipe that caught my eye was in Bon Appetit magazine -Blackberry, Lemon, and Thyme muffins. You have nice plump blackberries - fresh or frozen, mixed with fresh thyme and lemon zest baked in a delicious batter consisting of butter, cake flour, regular flour, sugar, vanilla and buttermilk. Top this batter with a delicious crumble, bake, and you have one moist great tasting muffin.
Louisiana’s new laws will essentially give all parents an average of $8,500 to use for their child’s education as they see fit. They can keep their child in their local public school, but they can also try to get Johnny into a more demanding charter school, or a virtual school, or into special language or career-training courses, among other options.
Now, I’m not a great fan of the cinema-attending experience: overpriced popcorn, pic’n’mix and soft drinks combined with the close proximity of the rest of the audience makes for a dull evening’s entertainment in my book. When I combine that with some of the fare on offer I can quite cheerfully wait until the latest ‘must-see’ appears on the TV or on DVD. I think it’s because I come from an era when the cinema-going experience was one to be savoured. They were occasions that lasted hours. There would be a support film, a cartoon and other bits and bobs before the main feature. And the main features lasted hours. You would walk into the cinema in broad daylight and reappear hours later in the depths of night with blinking eyes and an arse devoid of feeling. Ben Hur, Lawrence of Arabia, Spartacus and many others. They were that long the had intervals in the middle so you could relieve yourself and take on more refreshments. Proper films.
Goodness, gracious! I didn’t realize that it had been so long since we had done anything worthy of blogging! I’m afraid that the past few weeks have been spent working, sleeping, and catching one cold after another. And although I know everyone loves a good sneeze count, I just couldn’t convince myself that our illnesses were exciting enough to blog.
*writing and illustrating emergent reader books
And nominate 7 others!
“The Auditor General’s consolidated report on provinces clearly demonstrates that government must reconsider its continued blaming of apartheid for various woes,” party leader Theunis Botha said in a statement.
Q. You’ve been praised – rightly – for your skill at writing strong female characters. Did that make Sarah Lund easier, or harder to write? And is there any chance of a crossover, in the future, between Sarah and, say, Teresa Lupo?
Sprinkle salt, pepper, and garlic powder on each side of the lamb chops. Add Garlic oil to a medium heat pan. Then cook for 5 minutes on each side, and 2 to 3 minutes on the edges. That’s it! So simple, yet so tasty.
Here's a little project I wanted to share with you for the hop:
” What is truth and honesty?”
PM: 1:34, 2600' ~ Green Mt.
I think a big part of why I don't look back on those projects with regret about the time I spent on them is that I always spoke up openly about what I thought was wrong and could be better. Most of the time people disagreed with me and didn't see the problems the same way I saw them. They didn't always agree with the solutions I was proposing. Fair enough. But because I spoke up and expressed my honest opinions I was able to sleep at night knowing that at least I had tried to help and I hadn't kept my feelings bottled up inside, festering away.
Omigod -- a 26-year-old guy who lived with his parents has moved out and left no forwarding address! How often does that happen?
John Sterling - rhythm guitar
With Booktango, DIY e-book authors now have a universal publishing solution to create, edit, format, publish, promote and distribute their e-books all from a single platform. And with features like a free cover designer and an ever-increasing gallery of stock images, it's never been easier to create an attractive, marketable e-book.
Not a single one of the eight presidential candidates plans to attend the Democratic Leadership Council's summer meeting, a snub that says less about the centrist DLC than it does about a nomination process that rewards candidates who pander to their parties' hardened cores while ignoring everybody else.
My hair had just begun to sprout again when we met. I was sixteen and he was twenty years old, I believe. As I sat in the park at the University of Florida he strolled by on that first day and I asked him, “Do you have the time?”
In a medium bowl, beat together the agave syrup, vanilla, and lemon zest. Add the wet ingredients (including the flaxseed mixture) to the dry ingredients and stir until well combined. Fold in the almonds. Cover the dough with plastic wrap and refrigerate for 15 minutes.
The V3 hotel is expected to open in spring 2011, while the 165-room Hotel Indigo is to be completed by the end of the year.
Well, due to my lack of organization and life of chaos, I have LOST my binder. Along with a few bills that needed to be paid last week! :-( I've been looking for it for about 3 weeks now...I am about to give up and begin a new binder. It'll probably show up as soon as I get a better one made!
Political Parties and the Welfare State
After the oceans, the soil is the Earth’s largest carbon sink. But humus depleting agricultural practices have caused soils to lose both water and carbon to the atmosphere where these otherwise life-giving substances do mischief in high concentrations. Perhaps there are enough of us now who appreciate the value of humus-laden soils, ready to turn things around. Here are a few quotes I have pulled from the work of Dr. Christine Jones, Australian soil scientist who has been working with farmers and ranchers for many years to successfully regenerate the soils under their care and sequester large amounts of carbon and water at the same time.
hesitate to contact me.
Here is one typically cheerful note from the instructions:
Marriage and children
My elders were having me do a very easy and beneficial yoga mudra + pranayama, while filling my head with delightful and cheerful thoughts of Sri Rama and Hanuman.
In any case, Obama has populated his cabinet with people who have opposing views — Hillary Clinton, his chief and sometimes bitter rival for the Democratic nomination, Republican Ray LaHood at the critical Department of Transportation. He kept on Robert Gates at the critical post of Secretary of Defense — George W. Bush’s appointee. No one thinks Gates is a pushover Obama supporter.
I find the GBG useful when I'm on unfamiliar territory but remember that not all pubs that are excluded have bad beer.
In a joint statement, State Sen. William J. Larkin Jr. (R-C, 39th District), and Mike Oates, President and CEO of the Hudson Valley Economic Development Corp., said passage of the bill would mean "more local products will be available to shoppers in the area, opening up a new avenue of business for companies that are an integral part of a proud tradition of excellence right here in the Hudson Valley.
I like to call it my road to Damascus experience. I was working the 9-5 (so to speak, it was actually 7-4). I was on the rise to the upper echelons of the sales hierarchy and by todays standards, considered well-to-do. Not really knowing what to do with my life, I considered this was it. I’d retire and pull a fat lump sum to tide me over into the grave. I was getting involved in their leadership courses. Taking the college credits they offered for their sales/marketing seminars. I was taking any opportunity I could to gain a step in the world. And then a day came. I had been keeping an eye glued to the screen and an ear open, waiting for the opportunity to pounce. And it came. Cory came and pulled me aside one day and sat me down to see what I wanted in my career. I told him and he threw an offer only a fool would refuse. (Defined fool by the world) He said first I’d need to take a test and then we’d discuss things later. I drove to Spokane and took a very long test looking at diagrams and blueprints. After this, I then started building and piecing together a job for a university and then started on the bid. Not knowing how I did, I went back home and got a call 4 days later with a salary offer and some other propositions (only a fool would refuse). At about the same time I was having a rough time with other areas of my life and went home angry. As I got home and started cleaning (I tend to do this when I’m frustrated or thinking), I broke down. I got on my knees as a song was playing on the radio “Lead Me to the Cross” by Hillsong United and cried. I hadn’t bawled like this since the day I exited my mothers uterus.
Congratulations to Pointy Star! You were randomly chosen by the random number generator to win the 2 signed copies of Huntress and Fury of the Phoenix!
It was about that time that I felt I’d had enough family time for the evening, and I started to gather up my things and process all of this. But before I could leave, he adds that I am welcome to “borrow” the $2,000.00 fucking machine he bought for my step-mother (which Pops complains she doesn’t use enough – more information than I needed.) My step-mother then chimes in from the bathroom, “But she can’t use any of the attachments I’ve already used.”
15 foetus
“Too risky. Can’t put them on exhibit…, like freaks. It’s… it’s unholy. It’s my call on this.”
“Hi. How was your day at college?” he asked her nervously.
First prize is a signed copy of GILT, all wrapped up in a limited edition GILT canvas tote (plus an ARC!):
The boys that run Bar Covell in Los Feliz have figured it out: Girls like wine. And girls like stylish, charming boys. And once you have the girls, you'll bring the boys. Boys like girls. Oh, and boys also like beer. Et voila, with this knowledge, they have cracked the code on bar success (right, because that's all it takes, Tannaz). Even on a Wednesday night, the place buzzes with an energetic and beautiful crowd, and it's no coincidence.
for oxygen, and start to get nerveous
The fish has several advantages because they are lightweight, have few calories and help control cholesterol levels in the blood. They have practically all the nutrients needed to meet the demand of the body such as calcium, phosphorus, iron, iodine, cobalt and vitamins A, B1, B2 and D.
There were just so many memories made on this trip. I could go on for quite a while. I even enjoyed the 6+ hour ride there. haha
And it needs to be. That’s how God has called me to live. That’s how God calls each of us to live. And as I keep saying over and over, my life feels right when God is number one.
Track List
Educators can play a vital role in fighting this growing social menace. Children spend a great deal of time at school and teachers see them interacting with other children in ways parents cannot, providing a unique perspective on a child’s social life. Here are a few tips for teachers to proactively help protect students against cyberbullies:
Aside from the travails of being a down-list band on tour, the doc focuses keenly on the relationship between singer/guitarist Steve "Lips" Kudlow and drummer Robb Reiner. They call themselves brothers, with all the love and acrimony that implies. Lips is the hothead visionary, Reiner the cool pragmatist. When tensions boil over during a recording session, Reiner walks out and is subsequently "fired" by Lips, an obvious Spinal Tap parallel in a film full of them (seriously, it's kinda spooky). The bonds of love and music are strong however and almost immediately they are reconciling with tears all around onscreen and in the audience.
I can’t wait to see what the rest of the Design Team did with these very cool stickers! Won’t you join me as I hop around?
Here is a track that has naff all to do with RSD but comes from the best album I have bought this year and that is including the Spiritualized one. I do urge everyone to go get this.
The worst part of it for me was that I ended up with 34 children and 31 of them were all named Darryl and had red hair. This forced me to buy enough vehicles to get this family around. There is a space you land on where you can take the kids to the babysitter (babysitter being whatever player you choose) and “forget” they are there. Then the babysitter adds that many more kids to their kid list. By the way, each kid you have takes away $10 from your payday. So if your payday stunk in the beginning, it really stinks if you have a ton of kids.
Though the Sun lampooned Hodgson’s appointment with some ‘disgraceful journalism’, other papers had a more positive view
I need cheering up.
Until the crime writer contest, my online presence had been confined to my blog (I’d only had a computer and the internet a few months) but after the contest I posted articles on Gather, and I also migrated to other sites, such as Facebook, Goodreads, and Twitter. I mostly hang around Facebook now because of my discussion groups there, but I always return to Gather, especially on Thursday evening when I do a live chat with my No Whine, Just Champagne discussion group. I started out knowing only a few people online, now I know hundreds.
Dr. Paul was recently quoted as saying:
I saw these plans from Anas at Knock-Off Wood's website for shelves made from a pallet of wood, and I knew I wanted to make some.
GLENDALE, Ariz. – Mayor Elaine Scruggs will give her 2012 State of the City Address on Thursday, March 15 at the Glendale Civic Center in conjunction with the Glendale Chamber of Commerce’s 61st Annual Business Appreciation Luncheon.
For the longest time I thought that Take a Bow by Elizabeth Eulberg was going to be about one main character and that is the girl featured on the cover and I was wrong. Its told from the perspective of four teens all attending a prestigious performing arts school in New York. It’s not a book so much about competition and drama but focuses more on music, friendship, and reaching for your dreams.
You scare me because you are a cheerleader for the ‘blame America ‘ crowd and deliver this message abroad.
On the Monday after I was unceremoniously dumped by Adrienne I sent her an email offering friendship. I suppose you could say that I had an ulterior motive, although it was not a sinister one.
eight songs played in this broadcast are heard in that (studio) record, all except for the Smiths one, including all three of the ones that became singles. if an Irish artist wants to make it big in the USA Boston is a good place to start. there's a very large Irish population in Boston area, it was one of the first places beyond Ireland that U2 became hugely popular, and Sinéad O'Connor also became very popular in short time in the Little Ireland of New England.
"Maybe the weakness of Twilight as a narrative, and its lack of durability as literature, is because the themes I just mentioned aren't planned and don't work together as a whole. It's a mire of themes, but they're there, and they obviously speak to the reader, considering the sales."
I wrote last month that I had asked Dr Whipsnade to invite Paul McCartney to spend some time with my clan in the Congo. I thought that a relaxing sojourn apart from Lady McCartney would refresh Sir Paul’s creative juices and calm his frayed nerves. Little did I expect that my well-intentioned suggestion would have such far-reaching consequences. In all innocence, I had no idea how strained things had become between Paul and Heather. In mitigation, I should point out that Dr Whipsnade went beyond his remit when he visited the McCartney residence. He has since briefed me on the events of that fateful afternoon.
Perales: My family has been my greatest support. Three of my grandparents were born in Smeltertown, and a fourth moved there when she was a child, at the height of the Mexican Revolution. They all appear in the book. They never had the chance to read what I wrote, but writing this book gave me the chance to know them in ways I could never have imagined.
1 cup chicken broth
I want to stand with those who need a God who meets them when a loved one passes away or when the cancer comes back… when life is happening.
And yet, many of those emotional needs are only listed as "mild," which in translation means the kids are just ordinary teenagers who are more than a little shaken up over having been in a bad home--with deadbeat parents--and are now in a foster home and wondering why nobody loves them.
The SCOBY will regenerate after 7 days. You can kind of see the old SCOBY hanging down, and the new one is on top. The old SCOBY you can give to a friend or put in your compost pile. (I throw mine in my garden)
At the end, Pennywise turns into a giant spider. Problem #2. I’m also terrified beyond all reason of spiders. If you’re looking at me with more than one pair of eyes, I have no use for you, get away from me. I also have no issue with saying that I am a 23-year-old girl who will wake someone’s ass up in the middle of the night to kill those fuckers.
I fixed myself a cup of rooibos tea and slowly sipped it. When it was done I went back to sleep and had a second dream.
Thursday, May 10, 7-10 pm (this class is in Pleasant Grove, UT)
And time and again. Love fails.
I’m also a huge believer in flexibility and non-attachment for goals. If your goals just aren’t going to work with the more important priorities in your life one week, make up for it next week or simply let it go altogether. I know this thought might be nearly sacrilegious to some, but if I didn’t take this approach I wouldn’t be able to write at all—I’d be too uptight.
In summary: Three days of the usual, impossible boredom went by full of school, and studying, and the dramaqueen text messsages full of who was hot for Ally and which cretin on the football team was caught with Paige. When it was time for my date with Alden, I was ready for some drama of my own.
I don´t need nor want to stay up to date with everything just to play a friendly game. But most people do, and it gets harder and harder for me to enjoy a casual game unless I know the other player well. I have noticed that from leaving Fantasy alltogether, and trying to get into 40k.
showed me myself in everyone and everything,
Thankful
Hold it together — using whatever means necessary (yoga, prayer, Xanax, martinis) — and your calm, grace and class will always elicit much more help, kindness and action from others around you than hand-flapping and hysteria.
en meer dan ne kêe êk musstil op m'n kniên
and not escape again without,
OOPS. I think I need a spanking.....
Ali-Frazier III. The Thrilla in Manila. The final meeting of boxing titans. Ali had christened the fight in his then famous "poetry". He said, "It's gonna be a killer, and a chiller and a thrilla when I get the gorilla in Manila." As if the fight needed any more buildup, Ali decided to dub Frazier the gorilla, which did nothing to lessen the already substantial animosity from the Frazier camp. On October 30, 1975 Ali and Frazier would wage the greatest heavyweight fight of all time. The battle was so monumental that neither man would ever be the same again. They left not only their blood and guts in the ring that night, they left whatever was left of their youth as well. Ali and Frazier fought for the first time on March 8, 1971. The fight that was billed as the fight of the century and lived up to that billing. It was quite possibly the greatest sports spectacle of the century. It featured the first meeting of undefeated heavyweight champions. Ali was coming back from a three year layoff after having his title stripped and being prohibited from boxing due to his refusal to enter the armed services. Frazier had stepped into the void created by Ali's absence and had won the title in the heavyweight championship tournament. Ali had a couple of tune up fights and declared himself ready to reclaim his rightful place atop the heavyweight division. Ali and Frazier were friendly during Ali's boxing exile, with Frazier even giving Ali money during a particularly rough stretch. Once the contracts were signed however, Ali began to taunt Frazier in public. He called him ugly and an Uncle Tom. He painted Frazier as the "white man's champion". He claimed to be the people's champion. He turned the fight into a battle between the status quo and the voices for change, between the old and young, between black and white, between rich and poor. Frazier didn't want any of it and he grew to hate Ali because of the taunting. The fight itself was an epic battle. Ali dominated the early rounds with his speed and his jab. Frazier, a notoriously slow starter came back in the middle rounds. The fight was fairly even as they entered the last five rounds of the fight. The years away from boxing had robbed Ali of his ability to dance around the ring for 15 rounds. As the latter rounds became more of a flat footed slugfest, the fight swung in Frazier's direction. Frazier knocked Ali to the canvas in the 15th and final round with a thunderous trademark left hook. Ali somehow managed to pull himself up at that count of 4, but the decision was never in doubt. Frazier had defeated him and could now lay rightful claim to the true undisputed heavyweight championship of the world. The second fight in the trilogy took place in January of 1974. Neither man was champion at that point. Frazier had been knocked senseless by George Foreman in Jamaica a year earlier and Ali had lost to a previously unknown boxer named Ken Norton. Both were at the crossroads of their careers. The fight was held at Madison Square Garden in New York, which was the same venue as their first fight, it had none of the majesty of that fight however. Ali continued to taunt Frazier and Frazier continued to build animosity toward Ali. They even tussled on Wide World of Sports while doing an interview with Howard Cosell. Ali was probably just acting, but Frazier was dead serious. The fight in the ring was neither as interesting nor as close as their first fight had been. Ali won easily, although Frazier did score with a number of punches. The fight was really the beginning of the end for Frazier. He would fight only four more times before retiring. Ali went on to fight 15 more times after the second Frazier fight. The third fight was supposed to be easy for Ali. He had just recently regained the heavyweight title from George Foreman in Zaire and Frazier was perceived to be at the end of the line. Ali didn't train heavily for the fight but Frazier threw everything he had into preparation. He wanted to shut Ali up once and for all. The fight took place at an indoor arena that had no air conditioning. Under the TV lights the temperature soared well above 100 degrees in the ring. The humidity was stifling. The only ventilation in the building was in the form of fans that were ineffective in battling the heat and only served to circulate the already searing air. Ali was confident as he entered the ring. He felt that he would be able to take Joe out in the early rounds. Joe had another thought in mind. The fight started in the familiar pattern of Ali - Frazier fights. Ali dominated the early rounds. He peppered Frazier with jabs and power punches that Frazier seemed unable to stop or dodge. The fight began to turn once again in the middle rounds. Frazier pinned Ali to the ropes and began to pound at Ali's midsection and score left hooks to the head. Ali tried his rope-a-dope technique which had been so successful against Foreman, but Frazier proved too smart an opponent to simply punch himself out. He was much more economical and precise in his attack than the outclassed Foreman had been. As the fight wore on Ali knew that he was in for a battle. In one of the clinches he said, "Joe, they said you were done", "They lied to you champ" was Joe's only response. The later rounds saw Ali's punches begin to take a toll on Frazier's face. His head became a misshapen lump of bruises. His eye were swollen and his vision became compromised. Ali seized the advantage. He produced pinpoint power shots to Frazier's head and started to build a lead. Frazier did not stop punching however. He hurt Ali on numerous occasions as the fight wore on. Ali was later quoted as saying that those later rounds were as close to death as he as ever felt. The heat and Frazier's relentless attack pushed him to the brink of quitting. His corner pushed him out for each round and he continued his attack on Frazier's face. A series of shots in the 13th round sent Frazier's mouthpiece flying into the crowd, but he never stopped coming forward, absorbing punishment, but also dishing it out. Frazier's corner wanted to stop the fight after the 13th round but he convinced them to give him one more round. In the 14th round a nearly blinded Frazier absorbed a vicious beating from Ali and his corner did indeed call it quits before the start of the 15th. In the tape from the fight, you can see Frazier arguing with his corner about stopping the fight, but in the end his trainer, Eddie Futch, had the final say. Frazier was so upset by that decision that he never spoke to Futch again. Ali, upon seeing that the fight was being stopped, got off his stool, raised his hand and then collapsed onto the canvas. Both men had absorbed a tremendous amount of damage in the fight. And while Frazier's face looked the worse for wear, it was Ali's body that had suffered the most in the fight. Ali always gave up his body in order to protect his face and Frazier exacted an enormous toll during the fight. Ali was under a doctors care for several days after the fight, while Frazier was able to walk away in generally good condition. Joe Frazier would once again lose by knockout to George Foreman in his next fight after which he retired. Frazier had a short lived comeback a few years later in which he fought only once, but basically his career ended that night in Manila. Ali said after the fight that he was going to quit and most people believe that he should have. Of course he wouldn't. He would go on to lose and then win the title one more time and he would suffer ignominious defeat at the hands of Larry Holmes in an ill advised comeback. Ali is now afflicted with Parkinson's Syndrome, which means that although he doesn't have Parkinson's he has all the symptoms of a sufferer of the disease. It's a more scientific term for what used to labeled "punch drunk". His speech has been affected to the point that he doesn't speak in public anymore. His limbs shake uncontrollably and his movement is limited. His continued boxing activity after that night in Manila is probably the main reason for his condition today. The thrilla in Manila was an epic struggle between two extraordinary fighters. Both men were past their primes, both had already secured their places in boxing history, both had nothing left to prove, but on that night they showed the world something more than just a championship bout. They were no longer fighting for the heavyweight championship, they were fighting for the championship of each other. They had split the first two fights and the winner of this fight could forever claim victory over the other. Neither of them was willing to give up that fight. They both fought to the edge of death to prove something, not to the world, but to each other. Ali won that night, but paid a heavy cost by continuing his boxing career. The effects of his decision to continue to fight have made him a shadow of the person he used to be. Frazier is still relatively healthy today and while he says that he harbors no ill will toward Ali today, there has to be a lingering thought in his head that perhaps by losing, he was the ultimate victor that October night in Manila. +
Has breached the cocoon
Why am I saying this? You have to understand, as a supervisor or a manager, that there are some people who may be as smart as you are if not smarter; who are as creative as you are if not much more ; and who have excellent ideas that just need to be acknowledged and applied. Hence, if you are just restricting the power to decide and to approve on things to yourself and anybody else who is in the same position as you are or anybody who has the word “officer”, “lead”, “supervisor”, or “manager” in their titles, most of your employees especially the highly-capable and highly-motivated ones would be upset and might start considering working somewhere else.
We need to break out of our isolation, but we need more than just a book club. Waco just started a time exchange where people can exchange time and skills with each other rather than currency. Tool sharing is another way to build up community as the solution rather than individual consumption. Anything that you can do with other people that promotes community and shares resources moves us beyond the parameters of consumerism.
*all this snow! What a winter. i can promise you that when (if) warm weather comes around, i will be singing at the top of my lungs! But i do love the snow.
"Can someone get God on the phone?"
0x01 is called index. It seems to be another parameter.
Still to come, we will have an Eric Bischoff Appreciation Night.
want to do it quick, they want to be
We don’t see Driver in danger of being in the bottom two so we look forward to his performance next week. Driver and Murgatroyd are tied with the high score for the foxtrot with Maria Menounos and Derek Hough.
Thank you, Carlos.
our humble servant
Tim headed into town to get some light bulbs and bits and pieces for the van. I stuck the kids in front of the DVD player, made myself a coffee and wrote yesterdays blog entry and went through the photos i took of the gorge.
Evening Telegraph - Saturday 07 January 1899, page 3. The valuation of the whisky then was based on what someone taking over the company as a going concern might pay for them. Presumably that price was much lower than their normal wholesale value. Though with the crisis in the whisky trade, even the lower price might have been hard to obtain. There was already a glut of whisky, even without Pattison's large stock coming on the market.
Anyway...I read about this GOMI chick. Get Off My Internets. I check her out and read some brilliant writing, but written with a Viper Tongue.
2. At least two or three more of Patrick O'Brian's books. So far, I've read through The Nutmeg of Consolation, so I still have a few more to go in his acclaimed Aubrey-Maturin series.
But not quite. I am not quite there.
_____If I don't get a like within 10 minutes I check outside to see if the zombies have arrived (funny zombie quote)
'fortunately' by remy charlip is one of my very very favourites. it is well loved. the cover went missing a long time ago & my name adorns multiple pages in red crayon.
Wendy xxx
Just a quickie, I know you’ve been reading for ages now. The school we work for is a business and as such it’s crap. Money comes before proper education and TPR (Total Physical Response, which is an approach to teaching) is used as a verb. Our fees are the highest in the city and the school considers itself to offer a premium product. This is what they mean by ‘premium’:
Please release
If I need to return a cucumber because it's been soiled by a ladyfriend of mine, fucking well give me a refund. It wasn't ME who shoved it up her foof and turned the end to mush. But it WAS me who had to pay 69p for the fucking thing. I mean, the cucumber vs foof thing was my idea initially (and a fucking good one it was too) but I didn't force her into anything. Well, not until well after the cucumber had been put back in the fridge. WHERE'S THE JUSTICE, MOTHERFUCKER?
This, as you might expect from Pell, is a distortion of the truth. The 25.4% figure relates to 2001, some five years before the ban was introduced. Any honest researcher would surely use the figure for 2005 (22.5%) as the pre-ban measure. We already know from a previous Pell study that the ban had no effect on the smoking rate in the general population. Looking at the ISD figures, it is difficult to see any effect on expectant mothers as well. There is a general downward trend which continued after 2006.
* The human design is intrinsic to this galaxy, and probably a good bit of the entire Universe;
Like any kid, I was pretty enamored with McDonalds french fries. For little me and my little hands, they were like golden, salty, magic wands, able to appease even the worst of my temper tantrums and toddler breakdowns.
The solution is to engage Iran in dialogue but with an honest intent and not with a prejudiced baggage. The international interlocutors involved have to have a clear picture of Iran as a nation in mind. They have to remember its ancient history and its evolution through the various historic and contemporary periods and its position in today’s world. Iran is the oldest civilized country of the world and it has a rich Persian heritage of which the Iranians are extremely proud of! Okay, it has gone wayward in modern times due to its now adopted fundamentalistic approach in politics and governance but still it does not get categorized as a rogue nation. Iran is an aggressive nation but its current posturing is more because of its international isolation post its West-fuelled decade long Iraq war – which also gave opportunity for the Islamic extremism to flourish further. Its decision to develop nuclear capabilities indigenously also stemmed from these set of problems.
1/2 cup KRAFT Shredded Italian* Low-Moisture Mozzarella-Parmesan Cheese Blend
Pioneer Woman cowboy steak sandwiches :: apple orchard :: BWW's :: trip to ER for Ty :: apple pie :: Halloween decorating :: Bella's birthday (the big 04 says Jake :)
Her mom brought 3 sets of change and we set out to
The climb continued up through Lady Canning's Plantation and I finally began to find a bit of form. Once out onto the moorland it's a short additional climb to the Oxstones which mark the highest point of the race at about four miles in. Then the final two miles start with a quick and easy descent across the moor, straight through the Houndkirk Bridleway, and then a steeper and very rocky descent down to Sheephill Road which suits my style. I always seem to gain ground and places in these situations, and so it was on Wednesday as I reeled in a couple of guys in front of me and passed them.
yellow moons hung on autumn’s
#3 PROBLEM: I NEED a LIST that keeps me FOCUSED! I don’t have a family, or boyfriend, or have anyone demanding my time. So I am a spontaneous crazy person. I can go off on a tangent at any moment and at the end of the day, wonder “where did the day go, and I didn’t get one thing done!”
This leads me to question why not one single Rheumatologist, or OBGYN for that matter has ever discussed the correlation between hormones and RA with me? It seems clear that a relationship between the two exists. If you haven’t already, do yourself a favor and start tracking your monthly friend to see if you find a pattern. I’d love to hear your feedback.
He was excited to tell me that we had something in common. "I had braces too, you know!" I smiled a great big smile as he told me this. My smile ended when he continued, "But all my teeth got knocked out so it doesn't matter anymore."
TH Distress Card Stock
We drove to Ford Island and visited the Pacific Air Museum. Next to the large hanger is the still-standing air traffic control tower that survived the bombing of Pearl Harbor. Scaffolding is all around the tower with workers restoring this historical building. Admission was $12 with a military discount. Two hangers contained aircraft such as the P40, Japanese Zero, B25, SBD, F4F, and N3N (yes, I had Tony give me the info, as I recognized just a few of them). There’s a small cafeteria where we had lunch. I had the mahi mahi sand which and decided this fish is not one of my favorites. Should have gotten a cheeseburger like Tony did. When we first arrived to the place we could smell something delicious. Well, it wasn’t this place but at a building across the street. We didn’t discover this until we were leaving. So, for those of you out there, go across the street to eat!
PENGUIN CHA-CHA is about sneaky, dancing penguins (what could be more fun than sneaky, dancing penguins?) and will be the first picture book that I've both written and illustrated. Yay!
I will be strong, till you hold my hand so tight…
When we arrived at his tent in the camp, I saw John who had molested all of us in our earlier years. His Beatnik wife and undisciplined children were outside the tent. His children always ran around the neighborhood completely naked, and nothing had changed.
curry leaves few
I wasn't pushing myself as hard as I could. I was pushing myself. And it was difficult. But it wasn't awful. My lungs were struggling, and I spent a lot of my recovery laps coughing up gross shit. But when I was actually sprinting (well, running fast, I wasn't sprinting) it felt good. Slightly uncomfortable, but maintainable. Which was nice. Satisfying.
The first thing Delysia does is take her to a lingerie fashion show where Pettigrew becomes enamored with lingerie designer Joe Blomfield (Ciaran Hinds) who is involved in a tempestuous relationship with salon owner Edythe Dubarry (Shirley Henderson). The gradually emerging romance between Joe and Pettigrew is the film’s most charming subplot and by the film’s end we want to see further adventures of these two characters. Edythe and Delysia team up to give Pettigrew a complete makeover so that she no longer looks like a dowdy bag lady.
April 3, 2012
There is always a polite way of declining a woman’s favours without making her feel like a heifer whose udders are unfit for milking. When holidaying in England, a few years ago, I had the privilege of reading the memoirs of Lieutenant Cornelius Wagstaff of the Royal Navy, whose journal was an heirloom in a stately home I visited. In its pages, there is a description of an incident that occurred during shore leave in Naples, when the Contessa di Napoli invited Wagstaff to her palace to examine some artefacts of the late Lady Hamilton.
For an extensive presentation of this subject, see module 17 on guarantees and warranties in technology transfer.
What he said both surprised and delighted me.
So sorry to have been gone so long, but my brain has just been completely fried this pregnancy. I wasn't able to finish the portraits for the giveaway and I have been struggling the few times I have attempted writing something.
August-Work on Utility (should be pretty close to trialing by now)
Oh and feel free (I actually encourage it) to recommend albums that you liked from 2011 in the comments.
Are you calling out for me?
I sure am going to miss him heck I already do and he's only been gone for a day LOL..
Then his murder location turns up in an embedded code linked to the worst act of political terrorism in Europe of the 21st Century that is said to be linked to Gladio.
Then Joseph has recently and quite DRASTICALLY developed eating issues. I used to be SO happy that the kid would eat almost anything and everything! At least try it! NOPE. Not anymore. And I am pretty sure I have caused it. Part of it, at least. I used to (well, let's be really honest...I STILL do) just double up what ever Jack would eat for the moment and give it to him too. It was easier. For me. I realized at one point I was doing that, but didn't think (at that time) he was any where near the autism spectrum. I wasn't doing super harm because I had nothing to worry about. He still would eat a few things Jack wouldn't. Now he down to about 7 foods. Maybe?? And has to eat EVERYTHING with a fork!! Yup, so his hands don't have to touch it!
The smaller maladies, a broken bone,
Commercial DVD Availability: -
I'm death I come to take the soul
And like any profession, you find that it calls for a wider range of skills than you initally imagined it would.
God in his mercy lend her grace,
BAKE for 9 to 11 minutes or until golden brown. Cool on baking sheets for 2 minutes; remove to wire racks to cool completely.
Suddenly tired. Long few days. Why hasn't anybody cleaned my house?
I guess I just feel like if my grandmother doesn’t know, I don’t want other people in my life to know before her. I feel funny about people who I’m close to and who know all the details spreading them around. I feel funny knowing that other people are talking about me and my situation while I’m not around and gossiping about it. And I feel funny when opinions get back to me about the subject. I know how my sister’s boyfriend feels about it. I didn’t tell him, yet he knows all about my story. And I don’t know what he heard because I wasn’t there, hadn’t given permission, and I have a funny feeling that he probably wasn’t given the entire story. He’s just one example. There are several others that are more disturbing to me.
blurting out premature secrets.
The Mummy
The ten with Sumoi, who was suppose to supervise them, arrived to a large lake that looks very similar to the place where Apollo was said to be protecting from the enemies of the forest from the OVA. If their destination was here, I immediately assumed that they were going to dive into the lake to search for the missing Aquarion, but the episode stated otherwise. Instead, they were told that they had free time at the moment until orders are given. While the guys have normal swimsuits with a possible white hoodie, all the girls’ attire were very eye-catching, including Sumoi, who was hiding a nice figure under her sister attire.
Twisties ( are good for fill in packaging in boxes)
Him you know? asked Dr. Schmidt, pointing in Rex’s direction. Annie nodded.
I've done a couple of hand written scriptures on
Looking north along the promenade. The Floral Hall is on the left, with a bowling green to the front. I always thought this was a very posh place, with lots of well dressed ladies sipping their tea from china cups, while watching the gents play bowls.
Hmm, well despite the promises I didn’t manage to start posting regularly again. The last few months have been a whirlwind of activity both with the lodge, my digital media business and personal ‘stuff’. Not to mention good old Vodacoms total absense of service for weeks at a time!!
Whether you are trying to impress your friends at the shooting range or hunting elephants in the African sahara, I am positive the thought of a .500 Revolver has crossed your mind. Check out Hickok45′s video review of the Smith & Wesson .500 Magnum Revolver below and determine if you need to start making room in your safe for this wheelie gun.
I was born and raised a Central New Yorker but lived 18 yrs. in Va Bch, VA. I am the mother of two young men, who are 29 and 9 yrs. of age. I have been doing Reflexology since I was 11 yrs old, I have been a teaching Reiki Master for 12 yrs and have been Dr. Mom for my family using therapeutic grade essential oils as our medicine for 7 yrs. Having come from a functional family but living many years in a megalopolis combined with many years of being a catalyst for healing, gives me a varied point of view. Perspective is one of my favorite playgrounds! If you’d like a consultation for Reiki or aromatherapy or soul integration/inner child play please feel free to contact me at vaw4beacon *at* yahoo.com, Blessings for your highest and best, Vicki Willoughby.
When he returned to the Midnight series in 1946, Cole must have been delighted to have total control over a series after being forced to work with a host of assistants on Plastic Man. He even signed this story on the first page, a sure-fire sign that Cole was 100% invested in this story, which features perhaps the horniest animal in pre-underground comics.
In the main, what is said about Britain is that as we have in the past taken in groups of foreign refugees from violence and oppression, we have somehow surrendered our right to sovereignty, rather in the same way that if you invite a vampire across your threshold, he has then the right to take your soul.
Everything is in place to make sure that Bath can become a real force in European rugby off the pitch; now Craig has to ensure that he brings in the man that will make them a force on it.
Nor Oregon's white cones - nor Huron's belt of mighty lakes - nor Mississippi's stream:
Again, in no particular order:
Human beings were created by the Creator—by love, for love. From the beginning of time, God has shown his love to us, but he has never forced us to love him in return. Instead, he has chosen to woo us and invite our love in response. Love can never be forced. Instinctively, we know that love that is forced is not love at all. True love is freely given, and is experienced in freedom.
2:30 - 3:00 meet and greet
2012 Marvel Comics, 2012 Marvel Studios/paramount Pictures/Walt Disney Studios.
House of Night Series
This first category encompasses many books that I'd label as favorites...
since 2008, President Raúl Castro said in his closing speech after the National Assembly’s summer session.
As part of the choose Hand Made campaign this Christmas, I'm highlighting some gorgeous hand made gift ideas that are for sale by some very talented Australian designers.
children will be getting out of school early at 1 pm.
Heat oven to 350F. Line a 12-cup muffin pan with paper baking cups, and coat with non-stick cooking spray. Sift and whisk flour, cornstarch, baking powder and salt into a small bowl. In mixing bowl of a stand mixer, using the paddle attachment, beat softened butter, sugar and zest at medium speed 5 minutes, till light and fluffy. Add eggs, one at a time, beating until incorporated. Beat in extracts. On low speed, add flour mixture alternately with buttermilk, beginning and ending with flour mixture. Beat only until blended after each addition. Batter will be thick. Use immediately. Fill 12 muffin cups with batter, dividing equally. Bake 15-17 minutes, or till a toothpick inserted near center returns with just a few crumbs. Cool in pans 5 minutes, then transfer cupcakes to wire rack to finish cooling. Frost with Orange-White Chocolate Cream Cheese Frosting.
congratulations
What is it to believe in Him? It is not merely to say, “He is God and the Saviour,” but to trust Him wholly and entirely, and take Him for all your salvation from this time forth and forever—your Lord, your Master, your all. If you will have Jesus, He has you already. If you believe on Him, I tell you that you cannot go to hell; for that were to make the sacrifice of Christ of none effect. It cannot be that a sacrifice should be accepted, and yet the soul should die for whom that sacrifice has been received. If the believing soul could be condemned, then why a sacrifice? If Jesus died in my stead, why should I die also? Every believer can claim that the sacrifice was actually made for him: by faith he has laid his hands on it, and made it his own, and therefore he may rest assured that he can never perish. The Lord would not receive this offering on our behalf, and then condemn us to die. The Lord cannot read our pardon written in the blood of His own Son, and then smite us. That is impossible. Oh that you may have grace given you at once to look away to Jesus and to begin at the beginning, even at Jesus, who is the Fountainhead of mercy to guilty man!
Jaredites: Descendants of Jared and his brother who traveled across the ocean in barges and lived for some 1,600 years in the Americas without leaving a trace.
Well, this is where tragedy come in play...I was walking up the stairs in the parking garage and caught my foot on the stair rise. Down I go! I hit my knee on the edge of the stair and dropped my carrier in order to catch myself...there went my pretty cake plate into pieces! Thankfully, the cake was okay as it was in a separate container.
Her hair is pretty though, and she's lost a LOT of weight. Not sure I like that.
So both Lenin and Mussolini simply made explicit certain ideas that modern-day Leftists usually feel the need to deny but often still practice when they get into power (e.g. Pol Pot). Unlike the Communists, however, Mussolini did not make any truly revolutionary changes or carry out any great "purges" so again was undoubtedly to the Right of Stalin -- but that is not saying much, of course. Mass "purges" (murders of whole classes of people) and revolution are not generally advocated by modern-day Leftists either.
The goal of this meeting is to assemble an effective set of requests that operate within the law and get us real answers from our loan servicers. We will look at what the appropriate contents of the QWR should be.
Adele
I was pleasantly surprised by something last night. When it was time for the boys to go to bed they went into their room and immediately knelt down to say their prayers. It did my heart good. I have noticed as I have worked on strengthening my faith that I feel more in tune with the Lord and how He is trying to let me see how His hand is helping me and is trying to help me in my life. It is giving me a bit of a glimpse into divine providence on a much more personal level. Their has bee a lot more peace in my life by focusing not only on my conversation but the thoughts that lead to the things I say in conversation. In focusing on this challenge it has done a couple of great things.
Sorry to be so vague. We have our next appt with him on Tuesday at 3pm-5pm to discuss everything that he sees and figure out a game plan. He will review all of our past testing, present testing, hearing tests, etc. Let's just call him the "puzzle man".
I swallowed.
“If Betty was smart, she’d go hide that pie.” Even if there is proof that Betty is NOT smart, it is certainly more polite to indicate she might be!
Thanks for visiting my blog and reading this post. If you have any questions, please drop in a comment on this post. Cheers!
1- Mia actually a lesbian bfr she met her boyfriend…that make her bisexual…
so, i guess what i am saying is...thanks for sticking around.
How far along: 14 weeks. I missed a 13 week post last week because Lizzy and I both woke up with a cold/bad allergies on Thursday morning. I just wasn't in the mood to take a photo of myself :)
Green chilly and mint paste- 1/2 tsp(optional)
2 teaspoons baking soda
Brightcove Inc., a leading global provider of cloud content services, provides a family of products used to publish and distribute the world’s professional digital media. The company’s products include Brightcove Video Cloud, the market-leading online video platform, and Brightcove App Cloud, a pioneering content app platform. More than 3,600 customers in over 50 countries rely on Video Cloud to build and operate media experiences across PCs, smartphones, tablets and connected TVs.
This is a veggie version because I didn't want to have to precook the filling - so that's one nice easy step at least. You can just throw all the filling ingredients together, mix well and tip into the cooked pastry shell.
1989, 4 years old: I spent the entire summer covered in thick scabs, again on the arms and legs.
who will eat anything,
At 5:00AM I went to Starbucks, then McDonald’s, then Kathryn’s. Thank you America, I survived.
One of the first speakers at this event was Dariush Mozaffarian, M.D. Dr.P.H., an Assistant Professor in the Department of Epidemiology and Nutrition at the Harvard School of Public Health. He is also part of the Division of Cardiovascular Medicine, Brigham and Women’s Hospital and Harvard Medical School. He is a cardiologist and has been studying nutrition for about ten years.
Starting in the "upper right" corner of your row, join with a sl st in a ch2 space.( Sc, ch2, sc in corner ch2 space, sc in each sc, hdc dec in the ch2 spaces between squares) repeat this around the row, finish with a slip stitch to the first sc. Finish off, leaving a very long end of yarn to whipstitch your rows together.
but their rusted-out bones.
Wealthy older man is upset because his trophy wife is not playing by the rules and is confused why she is not being a trophy 24 hours a day. She had the audacity to beat him in a tennis match and then not apologize for winning. He is shocked and amazed. He is even more amazed that she thinks he is old. Seatmate knows about the wife's affair with the tennis instructor, but can't say anything because he's begun dating the Man's second ex-wife.
» fxView
Take a moment to look back over the statements that summarize how Paul was praying for his friends, the Colossians. Think of a few of your friends. Take time right now to pray for them, following Paul’s example. Then, send your friends a message via email, text or social networking, telling them that you just prayed for them. God will use you to make their day!
So may thy hospitable board With health and peace be crowned; And every charm of heartfelt ease Beneath thy roof be found.
In September 2009, we launched the Dwarsligger with 16 titles, and initially we received an overwhelming enthusiasm from consumers. Prior to the launch in the Netherlands, we always included all major retail chains in order for them to be involved in the preparation of the launch. Due to the large enthusiasm we received from the retail chains, we were able to have a distribution of over 95% of all book shops across the Netherlands, which is exceptional.
2. TOMS
Brother Louie - Hot Chocolate (Stories)
It is her willingness to heal.. the openness of her cells, YOU and ME, to that healing energy. The ability of her cells, YOU and ME, to let go of old patterns with forgiveness and gratitude for the lesson and move into a NEW way of being.
Susan finds a flyer for a Soap Box Derby at MJ’s school. Only, it’s a father/son thing and MJ decides he’s not interested, but Susan insists that the two of them can build it together and keeps pushing MJ. She stays up all night to finish the car, but when MJ sees it, he pushes it down the drive way into the path of a garbage truck. He doesn’t want to be the weirdo kid who is at a father/son derby without a dad.
can anyone say "bike in the room!"? hah! we recently bought bikes, and storing them is a bit of a challenge. here is where mine hangs (literally) out right now. the shelves were installed by me and my dad. you can read more about that here. i painted our back door's bevels black - i love the graphic pop. i also made the little skirt that hangs on the shelf below our tv - it hides unsightly cords and whatnot.
Richard Nash, Or Beau Nash as he later became called, transformed fashionable life in the city. He was a tremendous facilitator. He persuaded a Mr Harrison to build Assembly Rooms by the river; he set up subscriptions to cover teas and musicians. He organised gambling of all kinds. Gambling was practically a national obsession at the time, and was so widespread and ruinous that it threatened to destabilise the economy. But cards were also how Nash made his living. His post was prestigious but most unfortunately unpaid, thus he needed some means to fund his lifestyle. It is said that he swore most terribly when he was losing, but he usually won.
Housing also exemplifies another point. One year, I slept in a tent. Not every night, but typically about five or six nights per week. I had a place to go in the daytime; I just had this atypical nighttime lodging. This was out in the countryside. For the most part, I camped in very pretty settings — in the woods, in meadows, on the edge of a large river. It was beautiful. There was the time a deer stood, panting, immediately outside; there were the nights when huge snowflakes came gently brushing down the sides of the tent. This cost me virtually nothing. Yet it was something that my Ivy League classmates in Manhattan could not afford. Their lives simply did not permit — in fact, their lives did not even notify them that they should desire — an extended outing like this. Some will pass their entire lives in their little boxes, barricaded by their own pity from seriously considering that some of what passes for poverty is actually not that pitiful.
After the ceremony, we had sandwiches and chatted with all the guests and it was wonderful time full of reminiscing and joy. The interment was at the Glendale Memorial Gardens. It was somber but touching and as per her request a bagpiper played Amazing Grace.
A decorated veteran of World War I, Hitler joined the German Workers' Party, precursor of the Nazi Party, in 1919, and became leader of the NSDAP in 1921. In 1923 he attempted a coup d'état, known as the Beer Hall Putsch, in Munich. The failed coup resulted in Hitler's imprisonment, during which time he wrote his memoir, Mein Kampf (My Struggle). After his release in 1924, Hitler gained popular support by attacking the Treaty of Versailles and promoting Pan-Germanism, antisemitism, and anticommunism with charismatic oratory and Nazi propaganda. After his appointment as chancellor in 1933, he transformed the Weimar Republic into the Third Reich, a single-party dictatorship based on the totalitarian and autocratic ideology of Nazism. His aim was to establish a New Order of absolute Nazi German hegemony in continental Europe.
He raised his voice, “YOUR INVENTIONS, SIR! I’VE COME TO TAKE A LOOK!”
Where everybody knows your name,
Striped pink DP from Itsy Bitsy....
But those people never were our friends.
Ray’s brother, Mark (Timothy Busfield) thinks that Ray is crazy to think that he could afford the farm when he wiped out most of his crop. The bank is threatening to take away the home. The NY Yankees team from the 1919 World Series come to play ball in the field. Ray, Annie and their daughter, Karin (Gaby Hoffmann) can see them, but Mark cannot.
another outfit post from me... after a long lime, 'cause my old cardreader couldn't read the CF-card these pics were on. That's what happens when you let your dad take your pics... You maybe won't be seeing outfit-posts until next week because I was falling off my bicycle today. Quite heavily. I'm wearing bandages around both hands right now and my knee looks awful. And everything just because I didn't want to be late and did overtake a car too near to the pavement... However, it will heal.
I’ll order oysters and cancel the ersters.
Wear a smile – one size fits all. ~Author Unknown
1 c fresh strawberries or thawed and drained frozen strawberries
4) Your Paypal email if it is different from the email you are sending the order from.
William Swinimer, a Grade 12 student at Forest Height Community School in Chester Bain, N.S., was suspended Monday for repeatedly wearing the shirt to class. That decision was reversed on Friday, according to the school board, after the story made international headlines and provincial politicians weighed in with criticism of the suspension.
— Cockapoo Killed at the D.O.G. Boarding Facility in Putnam Valley — Westchester County
DID you know there are people AWAKE at 5:45am...yeah, me neither.
I thought I was ready for this. I had been praying for a very long time that God take her home....away from the misery she was suffering. But I was not. The last few days have been very teary ones. I've driven in my car screaming at the the top of my lungs, demanding that Mom tell me that she is okay. Pleading to my dad and brother, Dan, that they let me know that she arrived safely, and is with them. So far.....only a deafening silence from the heavens. But I will be patient and wait.
The acting, pretty much by unknowns exclusively, is nearly uniform in its stiffness. None of the performers really capture my attention and create characters that I want to spend time with. I found my attention wandering throughout the movie, glancing at my iPhone and playing mah-jongg when I got bored which was frequently.
Victory Brewing Company HopDevil Ale
1 railroad's
I’ve always been a great gift-giver. I think long and hard about what the recipient doesn’t have and would surely want or need (Ferraris excluded), and their satisfaction with my efforts makes me feel good about myself. What I suck at is “packaging” – a word that reminds me of the 4 Ps of Marketing 101′s past. You can have an awesome product, but if you don’t package it well, you’re brand can be doomed to failure. And I want to be an Oreo, not a Hydrox.
Didn't Obama promise to not let politics get in front of science? Pffft.
The political setting changed with the assassination.
Pictures are taken 2.5 years after the war.
To the believer God always imparts tidings of comfort. There is nothing to fear for the one who walks after the Spirit. Keep this in mind the next time disaster strikes, as for example the death of a loved one.
(Rea, Seattle, WA)
Abella believes that most of us are alive today because of Wohlstetter’s intellectually and politically difficult project to prevent a possible nuclear first strike by the Soviet Union. He writes:
Millions of dollars and one National Broadband Plan later, the average county, city and town has trouble finding a broadband map they can trust to help them make informed broadband decisions. Communities can’t pursue certain broadband grants because the maps that granting agencies demand show (ERRONEOUSLY) these areas to be covered by broadband. Why? Because, it seems, a lot of these maps are plagued with inaccuracies. This should not surprise anyone. Luckily, at least one solution to this farce is coming into play.
Born in Florida and drafted in the 8th round of the 2007 amateur draft.
If there were only one of them I could try the moves we learned in self-defense class at UMASS. Maybe Matt is watching me from the beyond like he does and will send help. Grammie and Grampie are always watching me. I definitely have guardian angels, they saved me when I skied off that cliff; they turned me around in mid-air so I didn’t hit the trees head-first. I almost bit it then. Yes, they will help me. NO, I have to help myself. Maybe someone will show up any minute and they will save me. Maybe these guys will leave me alone. NO, that is stupid thinking, they have a plan, that much is glaringly obvious. Maybe they will just gang rape me and leave me? But if Jamoka attacks them will they kill him? No, cannot let anything happen to Jamoka.
Tonight, look in on your sleeping children. Marvel at their wonder. Bask in the joy and pride you feel in them. Melt in the warmth of your mutual, unconditional love. Then I want you to thank whatever God you pray to that they will never bare witness to the hell and insanity those children in the documentary have.
Having dimension achieves the most luscious and sexy look. (Example) If you choose a matte color for the lid, then choose a satin or velvet finish for your contour color. The lid and brow bone shadow should have a similar finish if you want to keep it natural. Choose an opposite finish for the brow bone if you want it to look more lifted or noticeable.
Tomorrow, I will bake cupcakes and buy balloons. All of the Weasels will pile into the minivan and we will head to the cemetery for a somber birthday celebration, as we hold tight the gifts that Claire left behind for us. Gifts that were tools that carried us through the worst of times; Love, Hope and Joy.
152. “A man who has committed a mistake and doesn’t correct it, is committing another mistake.” – Confucius
"We believe that it is in the interest of the United States to engage with all parties that are committed to democratic principles, especially nonviolence," said National Security Council spokesman Tommy Vietor.
Oh and a Happy Birthday to my baby boy, Jason, who is 20 today! Love this kid!
Karlruhe - Women's High Jump
Papers are Echo Park and Bo Bunny. Stickers Echo Park; Punches EK Success; Dies: Nestabilities; spray: Studio Calico; letters: American Crafts: Pearls: Mei crafts
Good pinch of Asafoetida powder
Again, and most importantly, if the apology is presenter-centered, where is the audience in this equation? Shouldn’t the presenter’s focus be on the audience instead of himself or herself? The audience is already feeling disrespected because the first words out of your mouth are self-centered and all about you. Remember that a presentation is all about them! Focus on your audience.
Yesterday was opening day at the Del Mar Race Track which indicates the un-official "beginning of summer" down in the sunny So Cal city of San Diego. So we thought it was the perfect time to share this map showcasing the La Jolla shoreline.
If you’ve been looking for a six pack of our first seasonal release, Courir de Mardi Gras let me apologize. We definitely did not anticipate the incredible demand for this beer. We brewed seventy-five barrels of our crafted version of a Biere de Mars, thinking that would fill all of the orders up to the start of Lent and leave us a little extra for our own imbibing too. We are totally out of Mardi Gras beer just after a week of sales. We sold every drop, not even a bottle left for ourselves.
It was Wednesday. Average Wednesday.
Verdict: Yummy
Now obviously, this is not the world's biggest issue. No one is being deceived, since the label says very clearly that the product is whiskey distilled from potatoes, but if we are going to go to the trouble of having legal definitions, shouldn't we apply them consistently? Otherwise, what's the point? There is enough confusion out there about terms like "whiskey" and "bourbon" without further confusing them by stretching those definitions.
And like always Death was quiet. Death and Destiny never interfered. Death and Destiny stood aside to watch.
My first published piece of writing was a short story called Waiting to be Rescued published in Best Women’s Magazine and if you’d like to click on the above tab marked short story you can read it.
- All Brooklyn State Senate districts were won by Democrats except in District 22 (Bay Ridge/ Dyker Heights), won by Republican Martin Golden, beating Michael DiSanto with 65 percent of the vote.
In the car, Jin Oh calls his dad to tell him that he’ll be leaving for Manila and won’t be back for 3 years. He assures him that his career path will be laid out for him when he returns. His dad worries about Jin Oh going alone and asks if Mi Roo will be going too. Jin Oh reminds his dad that he and Mi Roo haven’t been together for awhile. He promises to visit before he leaves.
Your first book, ALEC FLINT, SUPER SLEUTH: The Nina, the Pinta, and the Vanishing Treasure, features a fourth grader investigating a missing Christopher Columbus exhibit. What mystery will Alec tackle next?
Now some hunt, most will gather
into flood plains
And it was. Friendly. I think I attacked a guy so I could look at his cowboy boots. Literally lifted up his leg and hoiked up his pants leg so I could have a gander. As I suspected, they were by Lucchese. This Texan knows her boots.
GREG KINNEAR / Jack Kennedy – “THE KENNEDYS” (REELZ CHANNEL)
I resisted temptation, took the book back to the library and treated myself to this one instead:
The FF#83 Top 3 are:
For example this evening I heard that a padlock had gone missing off of an inmates footlocker. If one of us finds an unsecured locker we take the lock down to the control room and lock it to the door. That way the offender has to come down there to get it back and we get the chance to chew their butt for leaving it open.
Births are rising for at least three reasons, the report says. The number of American women in their prime childbearing years is rising, and many families are deciding to have children earlier rather than later, reversing a recent trend in the opposite direction. Americans put the ideal family size at 2.66 persons in 2010, up from 2.39 persons in the late 1990s.
BANKING AND FINANCIAL SERVICES!
Pay attention to the people that pass through your life; they may be there for a reason.
Chism – 11 (No immunity)
My best friend is Clancy, my dog. When he was a pup he belonged to Mr Mulligan, but then Mr Mulligan shot his brains out when he lost his job at the silo (maybe he didn’t realise the Great Depression’s over Miss?). Now he’s my dog and he’s great, even if the oldies in town look at him as if he’s cursed (not Smithy at the butchery, he’s always got bones for Clancy).
What were the publishers thinking?
I think it's rubbish. I think it's not substantively different from saying no one but a fool ever had sex without getting paid. No one but a fool ever sang a song, drew a picture, told a joke, did a dance, baked a cake...you get the idea.
Full Sail Amber - Hood River, Oregon.
So. I got sick. Again. I'm writing again!
And if anyone thinks they can ignore the victory of our Champion and move straight to the ‘battles we must fight’ they’ve completely misunderstood the gospel. Yet I find that both the sandwich people and the pep-talk-people do this. Both the “more grace people” and the “less grace people” carry on as though David’s victory can simply be assumed and the Christian life boiled down to our attempts at plundering.
I was going to set a new article about “Why it is so hard to get rid of our habits” – I am drinking a Zinfandel, so the diet is clearly difficult for me, I could make the diet to a habit? – and I’ve realized, that my first question on it starts with a ‘why’, what again gave me to think about the most important word in any language.
The very first battle took place in Manassas,Va.
If you've never been to a Bryan Adams concert then don't go expecting elephants, giant robots, fancy lighting, support acts and costume changes. What you get is Bryan in his black tee shirt and jeans, some guitars and a few other assorted musicians also in black shirts and jeans and that's all he needs. He sang and played for two and a half hours without a break and every song was a hit.
Less talk. More action. You’d be surprised who can move mountains!
Is shrivell'd in a fruitless fire,
So you look suitably awed and wait for them to share their next gem of wisdom. 'I want you to get more big-name reviewers,' they will say. You mutter something about getting a bigger budget. If they laugh merrily and say no, of course not, you're in trouble. They will continually wonder why you do not bring them the moon on a stick, even though your stick is so small, and the moon so far away. But if they say, 'Absolutely, go get Martin Amis's head on a platter, I don't care what it costs,' you are in for so much fun! You will be talking to people's people all day long. Tony Blair will say no! Julian Barnes will say no! Germaine Greer will say no! David Eggars will say no! Martin Amis will probably not even bother getting back to you. Everyone you want will have better things to do: books to write, companies (or countries) to run. Hours of pleasure, after which you will contact your usual go-to guy or gal and they will do a great job.
Though I make Speckklöße only, at best, once a year, I lust after them each and every week. Speckwhat? Think of them as bacon dumplings. Think of them, also, as restorative after a night of debauchery and something you can make almost on autopilot. Hot, cheap, smoky, lightly greasy, carb-heavy with bacon’s ineffable umami loveliness, and better than aspirin when that bottle you hit last night smacks you right back. I could eat a dozen. Which is about how many this recipe makes.
I've just finished the second draft, and hope I've done enough of the major stuff that needed doing, there will undoubtedly by lots of little bits still to get right, but for a few more days at least, it's off my desk and in my editor's inbox :-)
I am not so sure why they were riding around the capitol of the United States in their birthday suits, but I assume it was in protest of something.
1-27-11
“Thank god for coffee,” was my first thought.
I have also embroidered the mirculous medal images onto the felt medals. For the side of the medal that has the 12 stars around the edge, I embroidered french knots. For the side that has Our Lady's image, I stitched a very simple pattern, considering how small the medals are, see my template below that I used. Where Our Lady's hands would be, I made little French Knots.
Tiny footprints disappear
Since I am not a natural-born organized person, I need routines to keep some order in my home. I have implemented routines with my children since they were babies, and they have worked wonderfully for us. Now that my children are older, routines help them keep up with homework, projects, and chores.
My evil bro is getting it easy, because he has a house and has gotten all their gardening equipment (which he actually did want). Because of this, my mother wants to "make it up to me" by showering me with all her living room rejects. It's all well meaning of course, she genuinely thinks I want it all. I try brushing it off by saying evil bro should be asked too, because it's not fair for me to take it all.
Where you talk in Russian and Greek
Jennifer, Cheryl, Heather, and I will alternate hosting the OLW challenge. To make it easier for you to find the challenge each week, I'm going to put a special section on my sidebar with links for the other three blogs, plus I'll announce where the challenge is every Wednesday.
Here is a contest I found that some may want to enter. My usual finder's fee applies if you win.
together enough
Indoor flower care doesn’t require a green thumb! To make your flowers last longer inside, give it the basics that you would need: water, food, and love!
I know it has been around for a while now but last Friday was the first time I've actually seen it at a pub or anywhere for that matter. Thankfully though, Moor's brilliant Northern Star was on as well as Camden's Inner City Green, so I managed to survive the evening.
I'll have to MEET UP with the winner AT MY CONVENIENCE. :)
I had a sweet elderly lady in for the usual workup. I was getting her onto the bedpan and while her daughter stayed in the room the son stepped out to let us work. She was on the pan, and making small talk - and was the funniest patient I've had in a while. She had me laughing so hard; I don't know if you've ever been in the same situation, but hysterically laughing while someone is trying to take a pee can be kind of awkward.
Contrast that with me, feelings on my sleeves, hardly able to drive by our first neighborhood without welling up with tears. The willow tree we planted, small and wispy, has long since engulfed the entire back yard with thick and billowing branches. And I can almost smell the baby powder and vanilla of sweet, pastel baby toys still wafting from the windows.
It bound her with limitless laughs
your love
This lovely mermaid is Citrina and one of the new images from Joanne Schempp for Sweet Pea Stamps. She is on plate #206 with 3 other gorgeous images. I wanted to color and create with some water/cool colors with her and the blues and purples seemed to just work perfectly. How do you see her?
Among the historical trails you'll follow is a pilgrims' trail in Lenno. This uphill route is littered with twists and turns and sprinkled with chapels, before you reach the UNESCO World Heritage Site of Santuario Soccorso. Next, you'll walk along a mountain route dating back to the 12th century to get to the wonderfully isolated Abbey of San Benedetto. Nestled high above a valley, it's the ideal scenic spot for a picnic.
It is time for America to let go of the past and heal itself. The grieving period should have been over and the healing started. But every year, old wounds are torn open by the words Black History Month. Why don't we teach the children about America's History with everyone included? To me it seems as if only a few Black people are pulled out of the closet, dusted off the shelves and paraded in front of America as if to say, 'this one wasn't worthless', this one wasn't stupid'. Why is the ‘black’ in capital letters? Is it to point out a person of color has a brain or is it to pronounce to the world we have pride? If there is so much pride in America for Native, African, Chinese, Japanese, Indian, Iranian-Americans and other 'hyphened Americans, drop the hyphen and pull together and teach our children that every bead has a purpose and should be celebrated.
I don't want to go too much into depth because we all know how honesty creates drama with my friends and my blog, but it's been a hard thing to just take and let it go. I know it wasn't intentional. But you really start to see how things are already changing before you're actually gone. And it's just another part of growing up and moving on in your life. But it doesn't hurt any less.
Recruitment website Totaljobs.com has found that a third of UK graduates have been searching for work for over six months, forcing the same percentage to claim Jobseekers Allowance.
I slip off my sweatpants and hang them on the hook under my heavy coat. I pull the ipod out of my coat pocket, grab my small towel and water bottle, and head out the locker room door. I'm very aware, even after seven years of being an amputee, that I walk into the locker room with a secret. Long pants cover the fact I don't have two real feet. Once I take them off, I know there will be looks.
Monstrous Beauty by Elizabeth Fama
It just drives me insane when people don’t do the right thing. How hard is it to apologize? If I hit someone’s car, I’d SAY something.
(On a related note: watch this Rage Quit: QWOP video. It is entirely unsafe for work and riddled with dirty, dirty words. But I swear I cry with laughter and my gut hurts every time I watch it!)
I feel that 30 minutes – 2 hours is a large time frame and I wonder if 2 hours would really charge my iPhone to full power anyway? Check out Justin Horn’s charging time test of the iPhone.
07 Don't Spill My Courage
I also intend to buy a gas grill this summer. Yep, that'll be me... grillin' and chillin'. Because life is short and I intend to drink in every moment of bliss that comes my way.
The driver looks to my parents as if they were going to argue with me, particularly my father. They naturally did not. In fact, just as I suspected a single firm nod was all that came from my father. They aren’t enthusiastic about it, probably because of some off handed sentimental reason.
Lover Enshrined by J.R. Ward
We will post more information as it becomes available.
Welcome to 'The Dumbest Slogan Ever 2006' and the winner is... this one that I saw this morning on the way to work.
Ground-level locations include: Flatiron Triangle, Madison Square Park, 26th and Fifth Avenue, and Madison Avenue and 24th.
HOW TO PLAN.
Also Avraham Avinu, A”S, pleaded for mercy, when G-D told him that He would destroy S’dom and Gomorrah, requesting mercy for the account of few Tzaddiqim, next to many wicked people. This was accepted by G-D, but since the city (cities) was so full of wickedness, it had to be destroyed, only saving Lot and his closest family.
I believe I’m going to work on both Borka Kegslayer and Madrak Ironhide – both warlocks – next because I tend to switch between the two when playing this army. They both have some very good benefits and they work well… it’s hard to tell who’s actually better. At any rate, I was able to get the paintbrushes going and got some models knocked out… I’ll have an update when I’m on to the next ones… As always, thanks for reading/looking!
But on the "good news" front, I have officially been welcomed as a member of LAMB (Large Association of Movie Blogs). I am LAMB #435. Check my post out here.
Oh! And I am having a little giveaway over on my business page www.facebook.com/alexandrakellerphotography! If you're in the greater Los Angeles/Ventura county area you might just wanna check it out - you could win a free session! xoxo
And as he went he scatterred thesmall grain
The plot of the game involves BioSyn moving in on Isla Nublar and setting up shop. Dr. Grant is sent to contain the situation — and by “contain”, we mean systematically murdering every BioSyn employee on the island. Yes, in JP2 you not only have to worry about dinosaurs, but people as well. And by “worry about” I mean “shoot in the face repeatedly.” In an introduction Hammond tells Grant that most of the dinosaurs are too valuable to kill, except for the raptors and the T-rex; but it goes without saying that the human lives on the island aren’t worth more than the bubble gum that Dr. Grant has apparently run out of (leaving him only the option of kicking ass).
Hello Guys. Long time no see:)
Bob – How can people get a hold of you to talk about commercial real estate?
Now I don’t know if there are ghosts or not. I’ve had weird experiences myself and I can’t completely discount the possibility that there are ghosts, chupacabras, yetis, swamp people, will o’ the wisps, or plenty of other creatures of the night. However- I find it hilarious that these shows manage to capture something paranormal on every single episode. I also love the way they force some supposed activity when there is nothing else to do:
I went to Lowes and got a couple of quarts of paint. The blue green is for the front room, the light yellow is for my entry, kitchen and great room.
I wanted to make a maze for them, with multiple food chambers, multiple routes, dead ends, etc. I presented this idea to the professor in charge of the aquariums (and the octopuses for that matter)–it was too complex. “The best enrichment toys are simple, premade, and affordable.” I was crushed. Completely crushed. All my ideas of having the octopuses crawl through this complicated maze for pleasure were dismissed… Until the professor teaching the course said the magical words, “Obstacle Course”.
There is a television show that takes the concept of torture by hope to its ultimate limit. Frankly, it is the ultimate existentialist horror. The fact that it doesn't seem to be horrific makes it all the more horrible when one truly considers the implications of its core message. That core message is grim, soul-eroding and profoundly nihilistic.
As for Jerome, he did mention reasons for skepticism of 2 Peter, and he only lists stylistic reasons which he explained as being due to Peter’s usage of different scribes.[56] History knows of 3 scribes for Peter: Silvanus (1 Peter 5:12), Mark (recorded by Eusebius)[57] and Glaucias (recorded by Clement).[58] It is more than likely that Jerome’s understanding of literary difference due to different scribes is reasonable. It’s perfectly reasonable to suggest that 2 Peter records the writing style and vocabulary of Glaucias (or some unknown scribe).
One woman talked about the importance of actively evolving in one’s profession. She spoke of “making the familiar unfamiliar,” a phrase that resonated with me in light of my recent TESOL education. After ten years of teaching, I was surprised to find that TESOL felt quite foreign to me. Even though the teaching techniques are largely similar to those that I practice – in fact, my approach to music literacy is based on the process of language acquisition – I felt very much like a beginner as I fumbled my way through the course.
Picking up my cross. Losing my life for Christ.
I stopped in the middle of the road. No reason not to stop in the middle of the streets. Cars had been abandoned, and stopped working long ago.
06-02 Washington, DC – Howard Theatre
This might be my first foray into Sportsgirl, but so far so good!
‘I brought you into this world, and I can take you out.’
The third law of karma is: once an action is done, the result is never lost. Once the stone has been dropped in the lake, once it sinks to the bottom, once the ripples spread, the lake can never be the same again. Once we have weaved a thread into the tapestry, it cannot be removed. Once the gem is reflected in the net, it’s image shall never be erased.
Doesn't everybody? I mean, I'm so awes -- Damn it! You just got my all-powerful Wish-Granting Dude powers, didn't you? GAARRHH! I walked right into that one! Will you at least keep all the changes I made? Please?
“What do ya mean, Zanna’s nowhere to be found?” James echoed. They could’ve been talking in a cavernous empty room, the way their voices had hollowed with shock.
Here’s how bad it is. I was standing in line today waiting to take a tour of the Rose Garden at the White House (That’s a separate post to come later), and a girl walked by in a T-shirt that said: “I only kiss Red Sox fans.”
Gradually add flour mixture, mixing (you guessed it) just until blended.
For some crazy reason I had thought that the house would be particularly peaceful and quiet since we would all be focused on writing. I had forgotten that for some people writing involves a lot of procrastination. I also didn't realize that I would be wanting to write and write and write without stopping. I would get up in the morning while the girls were still asleep so that I could get in a couple solid undisturbed hours. Then I would focus on food needs. The week was unusually sunny and warm so we took a lot of walks to enjoy the weather get our vitamin D before the rains returned. Late afternoon I would write for a while since the younger two were often playing with friends. However, stopping to make dinner was a challenge. Most of the time I really wanted to keep working. I was writing on a desktop in the kitchen that couldn't go online. It was good to not have the option of going online because that would have been an easy distraction. However, it was hard to write in the kitchen when the house was full of people or the TV was on in the evening.
In the Wood & Metal category, Geoff King was announced by judge Anthony Dew as a finalist for his unique wooden jewellery.
If you’ve been following me and my blog for a while, you probably know that I am a little anal when it comes to tracking my reads. I have multiple blogs, each one for a different purpose, but several that are book-related.
So the latest drama for me is the D.A., not me, is wanting to press charges against my husband for assaulting me. Apparently its a felony with a 5 year sentence because it happened in front of the kids. I have been avoiding posting about this because it is not easy to think about for so many reasons…
From anger to acceptance. She started asking me why she dropped him. I didn't know. I told her it was an accident, that accidents happen, and I was sorry. Abby kept apologizing too "Mommy, I'm sorry I dropped doggy" That made me sad, I tried telling her she didn't need to apologize.
psychobabble - people talking about Freudian slips.
'Skates? Ummm, yeah, my skates."
In addition to learning the ins and outs of marketing/pr, students will also get the chance to learn about journalism as part of the SpotLightSeattle.com site. Job will include marketing targeting and strategy, event management and communications with clients.
Sending it more than once doesn't move you any closer to getting on the blog. In fact, I just delete the duplicates, and throw the sole remaining email to the back of the line.
My card is quite unusual for me as it doesn't have a stamped or digi image but I quite liked this combination of pieces and didn't think I should add anything else.
Me…I do.
SEE? Pathetic I tell you!!
All of the newspaper material was accessed by way of historian Barry Pearl's extensive personal collection of original articles. My undying thanks for being able to access such an invaluable resource. The rest came from my own collection and a handful of other sources. Additional thanks must go out to Rodrigo Baeza, Ray Bottorff, Jr. and Steven E. Mitchell, researchers who've written extensively on the history of comic books and/or censorship and need to be acknowledged. Mitchell's series of articles in The Comics Buyer's Guide in 2003 and 2004 were a seminal look at the history of comic book censorship. Please see the end of "part 2" for a full listing of sources and a bibliography.
Although they will cross the stage and shake hands with President C.L. Max Nikias, other Asian Americans are planning a morning rally against the private university.
Merry Christmas to all!
The moment you find out you are pregnant you start loving and making plans for your child. You ARE a mom- I'm so sorry you child is not with you today.
Level 2: Ignores 8% of monster’s DEF.
Desperation. ‘Road closed’, the sign said.
4. Thee Headcoats - Punk Rock Ist Nicht Tot
"I guess you are wearing a hand me up instead of a hand me down"
In Canada, the indigenous people are not called “Native Americans.” Instead they’re known as “First Nations people,” “natives,” or “aboriginals.” Likewise, instead of “reservations,” in Canada they’re known as “reserves.” The term that native people typically use for reserves is “First Nation”; therefore, in Deadly Addiction, the reserve is called the “Blackriver First Nation.” Additionally, instead of “tribe,” the commonly used term is “band.”
I also would implore you all to read this! It’s a really moving piece of literature written by Sinead O’Connor (No, not the one off of Hollyoaks) the singer from Ireland. It’s in regards to the recent Trayvon murder in Florida. Honestly, she hits every nail on the head. Says a lot of things that I would have only briefly considered but other stuff that I definitely must have muttered before. http://kulturekritic.com/?p=2601
The administration, meanwhile, argues that the costs and savings of the USPS proposals should be considered together.
I’ll admit I was a little worried after I visited Ms. Jenkins web site and saw some of the other books that she had written. Although I have never read them, they looked like they might be overtly sexual and I don’t like to read stories that are overtly sexual. I decided to give her a chance though and I am glad I did.
Don’t waste spare cash you have left over from the move. Hoard it. Stay away from credit cards and credit in general. Live within your means, it will surprise you what a weight is off your mind not having the debt you had in SA (you will have other worries to contend with)
Isn't that the oddest word? Edible? Yet, unlike its French counterpart mangeable it does sound like the act of gobbling. And what is going on with the Gallic translation of "yummy" into "miammy" or worse "miam miam"? I take my eats seriously, no need for childlike lingo here.
Many interesting similarities and differences were also found in relation to family background, home learning environment etc.
Pioneering a powerful new form of online communications, podcasting for educators has become an effective way of interacting with students outside of the traditional classroom. It enables the delivery of radio-quality content that can be listened to anytime, anywhere – even when students are not connected to a computer. But before incorporating it into the curriculum, its important to exam some of the benefits of podcasting for educators and how others are already using the technology to improve and expand the education of their students.
Rule 10. If you fall asleep, don't snore. Make a pact with a companion to wake you up if your snorts start rippling through the auditorium. Speaking of which: isn't the theatre an expensive place for a snooze?
1 1/2 pounds boneless, skinless chicken thighs
A casual outfit day from about 2 weeks ago. This is one that didnt get posted due to being away for a while. Ive been enjoying capturing some of my more laid back days as well as the days I dress up. This is one of my favorite tees and worn in thrift store jeans. The necklace is a new one for Roots and Feathers... unless I decide to keep it, I do love it! And of course, my studded Blowfish sandals are so amazing! All of my pots are just awaiting some dirt, veggies and flowers! I cant wait to get serious in my yard and get my hands in the dirt. Oh that will be a happy day!
"HHHIIIIIIIeeeeeeeee!!" she screamed into my earbuds, "Myyeee name iaz Kareeen!!!". She said this to me as if her name were the cure for fucking cancer and she shoved her hand in front of my half-open eyes.
In 2002, however, the farm had to close its doors when its land was found to be contaminated by a Victorian lead works which once stood there. The farm’s buildings were demolished and the animals re-homed.
of pictures. Their honeymoon started in
Welcome to the home of Little Darlings Rubber Stampes! Here you can also find paper, sentiment stamps, tools and other embellishments, for all your crafting needs.
In the game, you complete laps about courses anchored on ocean or river environments. The bold in actuality pushes the system’s 3D capabilities. For example, the bouncing amnion and assorted island locales attending sharp. The anatomy bulk stays cottony bland as the penguin characters dispatch along, fly off of ramps, and achieve air-conditioned tricks. You’ll aswell acquisition that the all-encompassing surfer music and assorted appearance articulation comments set the able mood.
Cook for about four minutes on each side or until golden brown. Serve immediately with the sauce. Update: this also tastes great with Vegenaise on the side.
Beat together cream cheese, margarine and sugars until creamed. Add the eggs and vanilla beat until creamed. Add the melted chocolate, mix well. Combine the flour and baking soda. Add to the creamed mixture. Mix well. Stir in oatmeal. Cover and chill for about an hour. Preheat oven to 350 degrees F. Shape the dough into 1 inch balls. Place about 3 inches apart on parchment lined baking sheets. Bake 8-10 minutes. The center of the cookies will be slightly moist yet. Cool for about a minute on the pan, then remove to a wire rack.
Time for another challenge over at Whoopsie Daisy and this time we want you to use a Tag whether it is a stand alone tag or a tag on a card it's up to you. My teamies have come up with some amazing projects this week - quite breathtaking.
~ “Witchcraft” and animism in African or Asian contexts
Well, it’s not exactly hiking (unless you count climbing the stairs). It’s walking. It’s a wonderful wander along an elevated railroad-turned-walkway that runs for more than 15 blocks down Manhattan’s West Side. Central Park might make the postcard pictures, but in popularity stakes the High Line is not far behind.
May 12 Denver, CO WHITE HOT SUMMER GROOVE The Soiled Dove Underground, 7401 East 1st Avenue with EUGE GROOVE
“These organizations’ self-styled mandate is not to hold public and private power accountable, but to aggregate their interlocking interests. Their reward is not to help fulfill the social compact embodied in the notion of “We, the people,” but to manufacture news and information as profitable consumer commodities.
Second, land tenure insecurity, particularly in State forest areas, leads to social conflict and degradation of forest resources. Third, the trade-off between conservation and development activities lead to difficulty in deciding forest management.
There is (of course) a purpose behind this arrangement. By presenting its organisation as three separate business enterprises
“But when you look at the broad outlines of what we did, had it not been for the steps we took our economy would be profoundly weaker than we are right now.”
To create its hybrid network, L2 needed a waiver from the FCC, which was tentatively granted in January, 2011, despite fervent objections from telecom experts and the Departments of Transportation, Homeland Security, and Defense.
Hello Folks
Here is this week's sketch:
Tragically I was an only Twin – by Peter Cooke
While they were ordering.
Fashioning the Future is an initiative that awards innovation in sustainable fashion design. It’s a very cool project. It promotes the use of environmentally friendly processes and materials in fashion, which is inspiring and an enormous challenge for the designers.
Damn. 28. That is just too sad.
We started off by doing a bunch of the traditional shots, where Katie was helping with getting Tommy into the positions that they wanted for indoor & outdoor shots. After we had finished with the traditional sets, Tommy and I screwed around and got a few fun pictures of him with his dirt bike.
Whenever and wherever health care is in short supply, the sick and injured of the world must travel. Mass media, technology and more affordable travel means have merely brought greater cohesion to what was already a global phenomenon.
107. When he joined the singing contest, he is asked by MC, what to do with the money he wins? And Lay replied ‘To assist grandmothers in order to quickly recover’
